Even though my sister and I are 20 and 25 we still did an Easter egg hunt! You have to act like a kid every once in a while (or all the time)!
2 cups whipping cream
You’ll get all these folk in a panic
Given the nature of the illness I’ve had, I’m well aware that there are certain things I simply can’t eat and that there is a limited amount (portion-wise) that I can eat. I’ve come to learn how important it is to trust my body, to listen to it and adhere to its recommendations. I’m also aware that at some times my body will request a particular foodstuff and at other times quails at the prospect of that same food. The lesson has been all about learning to listen and pay attention to my body’s wisdom. And generally I’m pretty good about what my body is saying, but sometimes, my conditioning, all the things that I’ve learned over the course of nearly five decades, shouts more loudly than the wisdom of my body.
So I got on up in my saddle and we sat a few minutes waiting for them to call the Quarter Horses in for our parade. I talked to a few people there at the gate who were really nice. You should have seen the looks I was getting in my helmet and coat etc. They don't see hunt seat riders round that part, like, EVER! Lol. But we looked so good I was not too self conscious! After I settled in the saddle and relaxed I thought, this is what we have been training for all week and I felt ready!
Good Morning All
After the interview, William chats with Moran about law and order, namely about how governments are important but that sometimes people should keep quiet. "Bill," he warns, "your first responsibility is to yourself."
“And if I say no or demand a toll, like say half of the ammo, food and weapons you have?”
to those drops now on yours, nearer …
Pardon me for climbing atop my extremely long-legged horse, but we’re talking about love here. Trying to measure it with logic and rationality is tantamount to saying: “Teabags? Yes… Brilliant idea! Bit porous though, aren’t they? Wouldn’t they be better if they were… I dunno… water-resistant?” Sure! Of course they would… if you want a sweet-smelling pebble at the bottom of your cup of very hot, uninteresting water; or more likely on the top, since they would almost certainly float. Yes… I think what you’re after there is a pair of scented f***ing water-wings! I just want a cup of f***ing tea!
If, for whatever reason, you still want to email me or ask me a question here, that is fine. It's great. I truly want to help if I can, but chances are about 99% of the time, I am going to send you to the people that help me.
I started out on a great foot when the expansion began. I knew that I knew my class, and I proved it over and over again. Even when things got rocky and the guild I was in switched to 10-mans, I did pretty well in every role I was asked to fill (which often ended up being healing).
Venezuela and its military buildup was not on the official agenda, but Panetta voiced concerns over what he said is that country’s lack of transparency. “The United States does not object to the development of a strong military that provides security and that helps establish regional security. So, what Venezuela is doing in strengthening their military, we don’t object to the fact that they are strengthening their military. What we would be concerned about is how they use that military in this part of the world,” he said.
"Readers will be 'pulled' into this book almost immediately. The author has done a first-rate job with her descriptive passages . . . After this one, folks, you'll want to run--not walk--to the first available ticket agent and 'disappear' into the sumptuous Parisian world."
Several stories are relevant as business lessons no matter where you work. Former executive Bill Fitts is described as telling his team to throw away all written reports and notes because when they go to do something again in a year, it will force them to rethink and relearn. I think that’s actually great advice. George Bodenheimer, the future network president who talked his way into a mail room job, says near the end of the book that the “biggest tool I have for doing this job is that I am an optimist. I believe in this company’s ability to continue to grow by sticking to our mission of serving sports fans and looking for ways to do that better tomorrow than we do it today.” That’s just a ridiculously good leadership style worthy of any big-time CEO.
every one wanted her to smile,
They dominated the space and the energy of the evening, as politicians and others with overblown egos tend to do – the entourage on both sides, ensuring their heavy presence was known and felt.
I have looked at them every day and marvelled at the craftsmanship and the complete labour of love that they represent. Two cloths that I bought had crocheted edging sewn into the edge of the tablecloths.
Rémy: Latest job :). I don't know, I like to make the minis but when done they don't have any interest apart sharing it ith other people. But to answer your question I would say the Cuchulainn figure.
It's a good theory.
So, Harold Camping, I dare you to put your money where your mouth is.
Queen of All Saints
As for the project itself, the goals are to "ask questions and open up dialogue" by "trying to crack open assumptions and the narratives that we're told about safety and figure out what it means for who is in the room and for this neighborhood." There won't be a "typical" workshop or a set format, but participants can expect a lot of games, small group work, and exercises ranging from the silly to the serious, and from familiar formats like story circles and improvisational exercises to more specific and directed work on the issues at hand. (While they warn that such workshops don't translate well to video, there are some examples online from the Creative Arts Team, including this one from Project Change).
However, all of these paper dolls -- even those based on classic works -- were produced in recent years.
I've also used my sewing machine for the first time since Xmas 2009. I did free hand embroidery which I haven't done since I was ten. I loved it. I was brimming with joy. I love it love it love it. I'll be doing that again very soon. I want to get out my metallic threads and make a floral meadow of all different shapes and colours. I also bought some dress fabric to practice my refined sewing skills with, and water soluble cloth which i might try making some cobwebs with and other things.
This song is a perfect example of Lost Persona not falling into anything that is expected from their sound. There’s not always screaming, the avoid the all-to-easy trap to fall into of being cheesy progressive metal and the band’s collective influences that seem to vary from modern punk to the most aggressive of metal bands right back to guitar masters. It’s a strong mix of influences and it is risky to all be independent with their sounds as well as staying tightly-knitted as a band but with songs like this, it’s easy to see that it was a risk well worth taking.
These models are then typically calibrated by measuring actual traffic flows on the links in the network, and the baseline flows are adjusted accordingly. It is now claimed that equations can predict these in detail: Phantom jams can form when there is a heavy volume of cars on the road.
Now I find myself sick again. I have no appetite so I’ve been forcing myself to eat. I’ve continued to drop weight despite my frequent attempts at eating calorie dense and protein dense food. I’m bruising easier than I ever have. All my glands are swollen. I keep having stabbing pains in my abdomin. And I’m tired beyond belief.
I rewind to the moment when a 16 year old snob gets away with calling me by my race instead of my name and I didn’t take the opportunity to knock his fucking teeth in.
I didn't even notice... she tricked me, cause she made the sandwich inside out.
An amazing anime, includes an amazing story. And it’s an addicting anime. And it’s fun to watch great episodes and the art is quite a bit old for me, but don’t worry the story is awesome. And I would definitely recommend this. Much about mysteries and such. Funny characters and it’s definitely something to brag about that you’ve discovered this anime as well.
I didn't know all of Britannia bowed to him before. Surely that's his goal, not what has already happened?
“So I think that Netanyahu fears that after Nov. 12, Obama is not going to be a partner he can count on,” he said. “And you can see the rough exchange between those two gentlemen is very little trust between those two leaders unfortunately.”
one in a billion
I followed Marge's gaze down to a blonde hairpiece on the floor. It was sad. It was cheap and sad and I could imagine him tearing it off and having a breakdown because there was no gear.
94. Take a tour of a historical site in your town
I felt so proud of her for wanting to go on her own with no forcing and no fear. She came down that hallway into my room five times before she finally fell asleep in her bed. Each time she came in, she would either say that she needed a kiss, or needed me to cover her up again. Each time, I would follow her back into her room to tuck her in, give her a bunch of kisses, and then return to my own room. Eventually, she fell asleep. It was so quiet and uneventful, really.
Why would this guy openly announce a need for a New World Order?
But mostly Henry, my gorgeous Bitsy Pookums, you will just SHUT THE FUCK UP.
... giving low-rated movies a chance can really surprise you with some really good entertainment! I encourage you to watch one or two.
To break herself out of her depression, she decided to read 52 books in 52 weeks, and write about them all.
The Two Sweeps
The rest of my family doesn’t seem to get it. They ask how my hand is but much in the way you’d ask a person how’s the weather or what time is the football game. Not to mention, I owe them all so much money that I can’t even fathom being able to pay them back. I am essentially a parasite. I live off the work of others. I try. I have tried. The last time I tried I ended up with a life threatening surgery for methicillin susceptible staphylococcus aureus. The most depressing part of this for me is that I did it while working for Bob Evans. No offense to those who do work at Bob Evans but I should be working somewhere, using my talents in a way that is much more in line with my skill set.
Since 2000, Pixmania Group has been building a technical infrastructure and gathering a pool of e-commerce knowledge which makes it a leading expert in multi-channel retail in 26 countries. But they managed to do this by their dishonest practices.
When did you form and what was/is your musical mission?
"At this moment" is the key, because the cycle hasn't caught up with us yet: as publishers publish fewer books, consumers will no longer be able to find new books on every conceivable topic that are published by "reliable" publishers. That will shift toward self-publishers and e-presses. A major publisher is unlikely to publish a book with a small intended audience, so an author who wants to write that book will be foreced to either self-publish or forget the idea. But self-publishing means there are fewer guarantees for readers: the quality of self-published books is, at best, a risky gamble. Self-publishing authors often don't hire editors (or if they do, they don't hire qualified editors-- partly because they don't know any better); they don't have their work professionally copyedited and proofread and typeset and designed. In short, they don't go through all the same steps that are meant to ensure quality control in commercial publishing. (Again, let me emphasize the word "often," because I'm not trying to tick off the small portion of self-published authors who do actually follow all these steps.)
me with newsmakers. Cloudy memories of trips abroad, war zones, interviews with
Surely everyone would agree when I say that there´s nothing we can do about the weather but to dress up according to it.
And lives blaze with a sudden inner flame
I tell myself it’s probably a guinea fowl, a dove or a cat.
Everyone seems to be talking about leadership, many people are writing about leadership, and everyone seems to want to be a better leader.
A few tips:
Politically, this joke would go as follows:
'Twas the Night Before Christmas ... ABC Family ... 6 PM
“Please, like you know what chest hair even looks like, Kumar,” scoffed Charlie. Truthfully, neither one of them really know what chest hair looked like, or why it was even there, it just sounded manly to them.
2) Obligation of beauty;
This doesn't bode well.
Yesterday, I turned off my phone for an hour and met with my teacher and friend, Lee. I listed my worries, health and emotional concerns for family members. Even though I know my worries are reasonable (I don’t look for drama), I am disappointed in myself. Shouldn’t the meditation have diminished all that misdirected anger and free floating anxiety? Really?
surrounded by traditional music when she was a kid. When I
A damaged Syrian military tank in Homs, Syria. Throughout the crisis, Assad’s regime has held that it faces not a popular uprising against his rule but a campaign of violence by terrorists
Bravo to businesses that understand the value of all their customers.
It was AMAZING to me that my two biggest concerns about this process was exactly this lady’s two biggest concerns. Isn’t that awesome? I still am getting goose bumps thinking about how God is even now preparing Heath and I for the journey He has for us. It’s so true…if He has called you to something He will equip!
If your child does get into a situation where somebody is trying to push or hit or knuckle her or his head, you could practice by holding your child gently and acting as if you are going to do the action gently. Coach your child to pull away and yell NO! really loudly. Coach him or her to say "STOP! I don't like that!" Coach your child to look the bully in the eyes and speak in a firm voice with both hands up and in front like a fence. Teach your child to leave and go to an adult for help.
Micro Mask
- Promotes health insurance “exchanges” so consumers can buy “wholesale”
Having a lifetime of mechanical experience, I now have a career teaching the subject to young students. Given the right circumstances, even a round ball of hardened steel can be made to fail each and every time. That doesn't mean we refuse to use ball bearings in a thousand different ways every day, just that we use them properly and in the right conditions.
I've lost my voice. Really. I was trying to ask my husband yesterday to pass me a cup of water, but all that came out was a squeak. And that's when I started to cry.
So I thought I'd share a few linkies with you today that I found so helpful! I don't know about you, but table setting isn't always easy. It's hard to remember where to place the fork, the water goblet, the wine glass, etc. So I rejoiced today when I saw that House of Fifty has a perfect diagram to download and never have to doubt again if you've done it correctly!! How about that??? i LOVE it!
Screenshots at 250pm CDT 5/1/2012:
Cuz you ain’t got nothing
So will be blogging from Udine!
I made the postcard using the new Kaisercraft "Postcards" clear stamp available HERE. I know the first order sold out but there are more on the way. I have also added 4mm and 8mm brads to the scallops of the speallbinders diecut.
Keep at your goals. And don't quit too soon!
(sorry...the battery died so I have NO photos!!)
Author of Against the Current and Project Evasion. Editor of Petrichor. Musician under the name of Open Eyes, Ash Shields, and Dyaltov.
You don’t know what to expect.
Then a piece of foil from a Costco hot dog is heard rustling in the wind. chiiiiii- chiiiiii- chiiiiii.
She told HLN, “I do n’t think you can get farther, deep down into the rock bottom than we are at this point”.
I’ve been at peace before, so I know what it feels like. But he embodies it, and then shares it with others.
OG 1.056
Today is Judgment Day.
So let's go to the game pier, a Coney Island with a horrible 1980's future punk twist. Jonah is suddenly stopped by several hoods who attempt to rob him, but suddenly they are all gunned down by Borsten's men. Jonah takes off running as Borsten's men demand that he give himself up.
Valentines Day may be over for another year, the blooms wilting and the colours faded but that doesn't mean that we should forget about flowers... Flowers have always made me happy. One bloom, two blooms three blooms more... I love all of them and if I was guilty of one extravagance... it would be flowers. I feel as if our home is undressed without flowers... even if it is one stem in a bud vase on a mantle or a stash of greenery in a tin cache pot in the kitchen... nature, however simple, adds life and a loving touch to decor.
Have a super week, everyone -- with naught but the best of syrups on top.
The film was entitled The Devil Wears Prada. The screenplay was adapted by Aline Brosh McKenna from the best selling novel of the same name written by Lauren Beth Weisberger. In a few words, it is the story of a young girl who is naive and totally oblivious to the world of high fashion who lands a job at the biggest fashion magazine in New York, as the second assistant to the magazine’s Editor. As I said above – it is a job that a million girls would kill to get.
Aspartame is composed of three ingredients — two amino acids (phenylalanine and aspartic acid) and a methyl ester bond. In typical proteins like meat, fish or eggs, phenylalanine and aspartic acid comprise 4-5 percent each of the total amino acid profile. This is how nature intends the human body to encounter these two amino acids and there is nothing wrong with these substances if they occur naturally in a proper balance with other amino acids.
Does this mean an acquisition? I can’t say at this point.
Well spear a thought for those who didnt have such a Happy time. You only had to watch the news to find that out. So now that 2010 is comin to an end I hope that you all tie up your loose ends and bring in the New Year with much Love and Respect!!!!!
How can your fans see the show?
Near sports, self-esteem is likely to set. It can be evident those who play sports entertainment will scale down chances of unhealthy escapades.
After landing in Rome at 9AM and immediately sightseeing on foot for 8 hours, we finally paused to eat something substantial. For me it was a simple, warm pizza rustica stuffed with prosciutto and fresh mozzarella. Crispy outside, salty meat, buttery cheese, and a borderline emotionally-moved DB. Definitely a pure happiness moment.
I think I'll keep this design in mind - it's fun to try some new things. Thanks Basic Grey ♥
*za’atar (a delicious middle eastern spice that is so yummy in hummus)
The problem I encounter with the finished product, pretty and soft though it is, might relate to the yarn I used. Then again, it might relate to the design. I can’t be entirely sure though my suspicion is that the called-for yarn would only minimise the problem, not eliminate it: the buttonhole stretches dreadfully and you end up with a misshapen object that doesn’t look as smart as it might. No matter. It IS soft and it IS pretty. It’s also warm. Because of the clever triangular shape, it’s a garment that would ideally accompany a high-buttoning jacket or coat. Today, my jacket didn’t meet that description, so I confess to having been somewhat chill around the bit of me that was below the neck warmer and above the fastening on my jacket.
Sleep habits: Anna has been sleeping with me the past few nights, so I haven’t been sleeping very well. It’s hard when you have 3 year old legs and arms jabbing into your sides all night. Other than that, I’ve been sleeping fairly well. In fact, this past weekend I managed to sleep in ‘til 9 a.m. on Saturday AND Sunday. I can’t remember the last time I slept that late. It was glorious!
Drove Cap up to work and ran a couple of errands on the drive back home. Cedar blocks for the closets and floss sticks for the kids.
Having a hard time coming up with something? I still brag on my guy for things he did years ago. He loves when I tell the story of how brilliantly he proposed (there were waterfalls and stuffed portabella mushrooms involved…).
John 10:27 (AMP)
Chocolate Ganache Glaze
I have long known that I am not entirely what a film director would look for in an audience. Although I don't take it as far as the man I interviewed in Locks, the hatters many years ago, who asked me, seemingly apropos of nothing, whether I'd seen Death in Venice and, when I replied that I had, went into a moment's reverie before remarking, "Oh, the hats - what hats that film had," I have to admit that I too am prone to distraction from a film's "overarching and compelling story", (to borrow a phrase from one of Australia's former Prime Ministers).
After reviewing music for a number of years, you get to see bands evolve, although this is often with mixed results. Superchief only received a pass mark last time they were reviewed here with their album, “Rock Music”. I wasn’t able to put my finger on exactly why that album didn’t click with me.
“Spiro?” Meg wanted to know.
Location: Adventureland, across from The Jungle Cruise ride & Indiana Jones ride
for loitering in our lakes
He takes off his shirt and she takes out the needle but she can’t bring herself to do it and tells him to leave. Gwan Woo can’t do anything right as he’s always being rejected by her. What does that make him?
My expectations were wondrously met as I wandered about, eyes darting back and forth at numerous booths, each simply begging for the last share of my student loan. Of course, this being the end of the semester and seeing so many overly rich treats, the concern of temptation quickly becomes irrelevant. And when I say “overly rich,” I don’t exaggerate…someone actually had a heart attack. Granted, I didn’t actually witness this, but the sweet and rich factor can’t be underestimated. Until I treated myself to a golf ball-shaped cake drop, I was convinced sweet was synonymous with non-filling.
A bad thing I just realized is that at Purdue I cannot wear Red Sox colors without either some blue stars, to make it Americana, or the word Red Sox somewhere visible on my person…
Nameless People (Japan…Heinosuke Gosho)
It’s upbeat and folky! Enjoy!
Many IUSB Vision readers will remember substantive multi-part analysis which had gone viral on the internet with some of our posts on the subject still getting hundreds of hits per day; these posts being the most popular - HERE, HERE, HERE, HERE, HERE, HERE, HERE, HERE and HERE.
Here's one of our cheery daffodils, out by the front fence...
Michelle Mitchell, charity director at Age UK, said: “The inhumane treatment of older people described in this report is sickening and should send shock waves through the NHS and Government.
As quickly as the lens had opened, and just as the lens closed, I caught a flash glimpse of tiny shimmering stars of light...
I then whizzed the softened roasted carrots in a blender until they were as smooth as possible, added a bit of nutmeg, an egg yolk and plain flour, a tablespoon at a time, until a nice soft dough was formed.
8 Raffles Avenue, #01-13
Ok – so since nothing happened worth writing about, I’m not going to write about it.
These days it’s not unusual to have many different projects—it’s how music works. It’s less that way in rock and roll, but it’s pretty common for drummers and percussionists and bass players who have versatility. It’s also necessary to make a living.
Gender relations are broken down to challenge the established ideology of gender, the way of thinking that justifies social classification of individuals into two genders – the ideological assumptions that women have to be passive and skinny to be attractive are picked apart many instances in the film.
Then comes the dum dum that met him at the door,
Not knowing why the stars glow.
And as a bonus challenge - use some kind of embossing (dry, heat, etc). We know not everyone has the tools for embossing, so don't want to prevent people from playing, but it might be a fun one to add if you have the tools/product!
so close that your eyes close as I fall asleep.
Be sure to print the coupon twice! Use zip 16214.
I think the reason the crows keep moving back to populated areas is they actually like us. My pair don’t seem to mind if I’m on the deck and they fly down to investigate. I don’t usually see them on the rail unless I’m outside. I’m hoping it’s friendship I see in the bright eye and tip of the head and not an appraisal of dinner to come.
"HAVE A NICE DAY!"
But what a pallet! A thousand copies of 'Winter Sun and Summer Rain' - ten cracking original tracks, hot from replication in France. Tears, commitment and joy laser-burnt into plastic. Expertly mixed by the awesomely talented Nick Wilson at Dave Neal Studios (Dave Neal was Suzi Quatro's drummer).
Those hoping for their regular dose of condo negativism may be disappointed by this post. I’m gonna say something nice about a real estate marketing campaign. No, I haven’t been paid off. (If anyone wants to buy my goodwill, email me and I’ll give instructions on where to send the money.)
When finding an image for my last post on Google, I noticed a suggested search was ‘adele fat’ – I clicked on it and found this picture.
emanuel nice- don't say ok
This month a new sponsor popped in to give me some support in my blogging venture, and I am so excited for the partnership. In fact, simplify 101 has a special place in my organizing loving heart since they specialize in organizing and simplifying your life!
Well, I'm not sure it's *actually* worth one of my organs, but I would certainly have to sell one to buy it.
I wonder how long it will take 'till we're alone
Congratulations Leah Ann, please email Deb with your details!
The CSIR has issued a statement denying reports that it had gagged Mr Turton and that he was suspended for what are called "inappropriate statements" to the media.
The freedom to grow and develop authentically, without all the pressure to conform conform conform. Living without the constant control of an authoritarian environment. Being in an environment where I felt (and feel) supported and loved, not watched and judged. Being able to truly get to know myself, because so, so many people really don't know themselves at all. Developing confidence that my shy, people pleasing, sensitive self would probably not have developed in school (I honestly think I would have been one of these people who leaves school with serious emotional scars). I see LOTS of advantages to being out of school...
You give faces a bad name sucker so why don't you give some dog your tiny bone.
I was at a concert during the 2000 Reunion tour.
As a side note creator Marieke Hardy mentioned on her Twitter feed that the show had been picked up for a second season. Don’t really understand why the ABC have done that as the show’s ratings are fairly low even by ABC standards and the reviews haven’t exactly been stellar. It kind of feels like the ABC is just renewing everything these days. Still, I remain optimistic. I think that if Hardy and Co. can see the faults with the first series than a second season may right some wrongs, but if they think they did a stellar job across the board than I’m sure 2012 will just offer up more droopy faced Alison Bell muttering her way through awkward conversations.
perma-grin = permanent grin on one's face
Why do you think the anti-gay marriage amendment has not had more traction in congress, even when President Bush supported it, and he had a Republican senate and Republican house? The reason is that politicians know that a law like this would never survive scrutiny before the Supreme Court, because even conservative justices like Scalia and Thomas could not overlook the fact that this is a blatantly discriminatory policy. And by bringing the argument before the court, and losing on discriminatory grounds, the anti-gay marriage side would essentially be codifying the national right for gay couples to marry. This, in fact, will most likely end up being how gay marriage will become legal nationally; and then there may be a law that will follow.
Frantically I called back the number that was on my phone…and it was a recording saying the office of the Texas Democratic Party was closed. I left a message, but was not hopeful.
There's two chances to win a Craft it Forward gift made by me for you. All you have to do is leave a comment letting me know why you love making things or love handmade stuff and then what you would like me to make for you if you win. Do you fancy a Spring Posy Brooch, Whoopie Doo Pincushion or a Jolly Good Egg Cosy?
As we know from contemporary sources and modern historians, the role of women in Viking society was wide-ranging and potent. I see that one of my A4 pages lists them as household managers (i.e. running largely self-reliant farmsteads), loyal to a fault, inciters of feuds to protect family honour and yet also arbiters in community disputes, scapegoats, praise-subjects, beloved, beautiful and dangerous, feared for their sexual and magical powers. What is missing, yes, is much talk of Viking women as mothers!
and we've strained our hearts
Don’t get me wrong, I love my church and my lord more than anything in the world. And blogging helps me be my rawest truest form of me. The craziest bluntest stupidest most sinful me that I am. And as silly as that sounds its like therapy. It allows me to be honest about my flaws. I have anger management problems sometimes. I am a nervous wreck ALL the time. I live with GAD and it hinders me and makes me think I’m never good enough. In an attempt to keep myself from being taken advantage of I tend to be extremely sarcastic and mean to guys. Not gonna lie, I think that’s a big factor to my singleness. I’m kinda selfish sometimes. I’m lazy very very lazy and disorganized. Man I’m extremely disorganized. I’m also clumsy, that really has nothing to do with my soul but I kinda just wanted to tell you that today I bruised myself inside of my mouth using my toothbrush. I think that alone deserves an award. I clearly tend to over exaggerate things as well. I prejudge people, and hold grudges sometimes instead of forgiving. I am an angry driver, when someone cuts me off or doesn’t use turn signals i tend to get a little pissed off. I know that I’m not perfect. Heck I’m a big mess of a person. To anyone who’s ever met me in person I may seem put together….well perhaps not. But if I seem a little bit together I am in no way put together. I’m usually a big blob of mistakes and anxiety.
We plan on forgetting about all of this house mess while we're there, don't worry!!!
4. Favorite non-alcoholic drink? Cold Kombucha drinks (like GT’s Organic Raw Kombucha)!
And communicating with others in a
Good luck poets! Do the GTA proud!
Choose a simple piping design if you are not yet confident with intricate piping. Not only with this save you time, but will ensure that your cake looks neater and elegant. Simple can sometimes be key.
These are SO easy and SO delicious that I think it'd be silly if it wasn't added to your menu.
So, a year ago my Daddy died . . . it wasn’t fun to watch him go and life just wasn’t quite the same this last year without him. Not only did I miss him but I started to gain weight . . . with my two weekly radio shows (TalkWorthy on SiriusXM 143) and Healthy Wealthy Wow Surthrival! on 1480 AM and Utah Valley Live . . . along with my eMedia clients I just didn’t take time to care for myself like I should have.
Gosh, this is like a dream.
I'm still having fun digging into old linens and making them new and happy again. This is a set of Ralph Lauren pillow cases I found in a sale bin and bought ages ago. They don't really go with a thing (which never keeps me from using things I love in my home), but they've now reached that lovely texture of softness and fray. I blanket stitched the edges and corners to keep them whole.
Hugs, Love and a "May Junk Finds" Bus on the Cheek!
Tell him you thought "The Da Vinci Code" was an excellent book, and the movie was even better.
More snoring
--New York School of Career and Applied Studies
She pulled my dick out and held it in the palm of her hand for a second or two. She breathed in and out in quick succession then smelt my dick.
07. Broken Home feat. Toni Hill
1/2 cup cherry preserves
I would like to thank a lot of people that gave me opportunities and sage advice in both the areas of writing and performance – I may forget someone, sorry. First and mostly my wife, Lesley, as well as my kids – who have been the inspiration for many of my best bits. I want to thank Mark Breslin and Jason Laurens for allowing me to ply my wares on your stages – to all the staff at any of the venues I played – especially Jeff Tanguay from Absolute Comedy in Ottawa. I was in a great position when I started comedy in 1995 to be able to have my comedy college be at The Laugh Resort. Being able to watch some of the best (like Gary Valentine, Kevin James, Ray Romano, Todd Barry, Barry Julien, John Rogers and Jeff Rothpan) but more importantly to hang with some of the best comedy professors a guy could ask for. That group included Barry Kennedy, Tim Steeves, Steve Levine, Randy Metson, Mark Farrell, Tim Rykert and Harry Doupe. Beyond that, the people that helped mentored me including Mike Cliff, Tim Nutt and two of my best friends – Darryl Purvis and Winston Spear.
I see so many people who don't see what heroes they are...they commit astounding acts of kindness...that go totally unnoticed by their peers, but are deeply appreciated, life-changing,
Last week after we departed from Visthar, we spent the week in Orissa (northern India) at an awesome NGO (non-governmental organization) called WIDA or IRDWSI (Integrated Rural Development for the Weaker Sections in India). WIDA is easier to remember. I believe it's a tribal word that means binding together.
Hello! It's Saskia here, for this week's challenge! We have a 2 months school holiday here in Belgium (July and August). I love to spend some time abroad, but I'm always so happy to come home!! So for this challenge, the Design Team wants to see a project about 'home'... a new house, moving, a village, a bird house,... Enjoy crafting!
Newt blew the good will he built up in the last debate by opening his mouth today. Yes we all agree he comes up with wonderful quips during a debate but then he opens his mouth outside of a debate and you remember what a sleazy piece of crap he is.
both forgetting the everyday issues.
However, I liked that everything went towards the inevitable - pretty much everyone dies. I was also glad that they didn't find some magical 11th hour silver bullet that would do away with the alien/sea monster in a hot minute. I'm sick of that happening in pretty much every creature movie (Signs and War of the Worlds being prime examples). Sometimes, the monster's going to win. It's bigger, hungrier, and apparently, our most advanced weaponry doesn't work on beasties. Ever.
I printed out the trees on white CS, sponged the background in different colors of green, doodled on the lines with glitter markers and adorn some stones and rhinestones from Pizzazz Aplenty. Have you noticed, I have also done some embossing :). Okey, lots of embossing :D. The kraft CS is embossed and distressed over with brown ink and same was done with the DP too. The sentiment is glittered rub on.
I was going to copy and paste my little author bio here but who needs that when I can give you an 'off the top of my head and slightly inaccurate due to long hours at work' description? I like to write. A lot. I'm sure that's an obvious thing to say but it had to be said. I love to create in any way shape or form. Some days I'll come home and think "I need to create something" whether it's music, paintings, or stories. Is that odd? I can't help it. It's one of those little habits you just can't kick.
But one group of men thrown together by the conflict didn’t look likely to be able to get along at all…even though their lives depended on it.
BATTER MIX: Mix all of the seasonings and flour together and then add water and whisk to a smooth and thick consistency. Dip quorn pieces in the batter and fry on a moderately high heat for 10 minutes or until cooked through.OR you can fry the quorn until the coating goes crispy and then preheat your oven and cook the pieces for a further 10-15 minutes on 180 degrees, or until cooked through.
– Drac­ula by Bram Stoker
Knowing that adopting this new approach of tossing in a bit of plausibility into my stories was going to severly affect my “writing groove” as it were, I decided to practice before diving head-in.
Our next stop was Memphis, Tennessee, a short 2 hour drive from Hot Springs. I’d always wanted to see Memphis and hoped we’d have a couple days, but we had to be at the Airstream dealer on Friday, which also was the first night of Passover. While driving, I mentioned to Annie, “I wish someone could pick us up at the campsite and take us on a tour of Memphis (I didn’t want to drive anymore).” Well, as fate would have it, when we checked into the Memphis KOA, Annie asked the lady at the desk about tours of Memphis. She said a van was soon coming to pick up some other guests in about an hour – so we signed up for a blues tour with a very disorganized touring company called “Memphis Blues Tours.” I won’t get into all the details but here’s what I will say: we saw Graceland twice – never went in but saw it twice – saw Sun records twice too – went inside the second time and the only thing worth buying was a milks shake – the tee shirts were $30 each and people were walking over each other to buy old Elvis CDs for $20 – Sun is where Elvis recorded most of his hit records like “Hound Dog and All Shook Up.” Our driver took us to the Lorraine Hotel, where Martin Luther King was assassinated by James Earl Ray. That was eerie. He took us to the Memphis visitors center where they have a great big statue of my blues mentor, B.B. King – that was cool. We went on to Beale Street, where B.B. King first got his big start, as a dee jay and singing on the street for pocket change. On the way to Beale street, my cell phone started ringing – it was #2 son – apparently he’d accidentally “knocked” the water spout off the water heater in the basement, and 50 gallons of water was pouring all over the basement floor – it was a “courtesy call” to give me a “heads up” and said the plumber was on the way and by the way, I need your credit card number. All the while, I’m trying to be quiet on the bus so the others could listen to the tour guide explain all the sights he was showing us, including Gus’s Fried Chicken, supposedly the best fried chicken in Memphis! Next, the plumber got on the phone to tell me it would cost $1200 for a new water heater. I applied a great tool I learned in the 12 step program – the Pause Button. I told him I was out of town and couldn’t make a snap decision, that I’d pay him for the service call. I just requested that he make sure the water heater was turned off so it wouldn’t spill anymore water. I’d think things over and get back with him. Meanwhile, #2 son was throwing towels down on the per go floor. Not trusting the fate of my basement to an 18 year old, I call my neighbor who came over and properly handled things. He later called to reassure me no water damage – thank goodness!!! Our Passover journey continued. We drove right by the Gibson guitar factory and Stax records, where Albert King recorded, as well as Booker T and the MG’s, and Otis Redding. We were given 30 minutes to walk along Beale street, which is a lot like Bourbon Street in New Orleans – a tourist attraction. We wound up our tour at the Peabody Hotel an get to watch the Duck master march the ducks from the water pond by the registrations desk, on a red carpet, to the balcony of the hotel – you can google Peabody Hotel if you want to learn more. After several bus transfers, another stop at Graceland, we were dropped safety back to the KOA. I figured Memphis is a place to go back to so I can try Gus’s Fried Chicken, take a tour of the Gibson Guitar Factory, and Stax Records.
Another dollar earned pressing the buttons of catering nonsense.
What’s the biggest writing (or creative) mistake you ever made?
Bay leaf-3
Postage stamp die: Spellbinders
Maybe just coincidence but each middle eastern protest has taken place in the original Masonic symbol of the square..
Seeing his mother and the other women, his near and dear ones at the foot of the cross PIQUES Jesus to state a PROFOUND FACT and exposit a PROVISION of MAGNITUDE proportions and say the THIRD saying on the cross. Woman, Behold thy son! Behold thy mother!
About a month ago, we decided to try our hands at making an egg incubator...we had an old copper box with a light bulb and cord already wired into it...in fact...it was used as our first refrigerator...that is a different story, though! LOL!
Like many parents now days, we bought the cribs that converted to toddler beds that convert to a full sized bed as well. Below you see they all gathered as Daddy opened their new railings!
That’s the refrain I hear every day, although when Connor says it, hot dog sounds more like “hawk gog”.
But what curry? And what beer? I go for lamb bhuna with pilau rice for one reason and one reason only, on the label is the word “hot”. Not medium, not mild, but hot. I am a heterosexual man and part of being one is eating hot curry. Failure to do so, in Britain, results in an invite to a Gay Pride march and a free pair of pink jeans from our failed government who like to promote such things in the hope of attracting the pink vote, because no one else will vote for them. Now I’m not homophobic, men with a liking for soft furnishings and the music of ABBA are unthreatening people that can give you stylish advice on clothes and male grooming and have no desire to steal your girlfriend, they may not like football but they are alright and tend to know how to mix a cocktail. Gay people have a useful role in society. I’d rather the lady squeeze talk to her gay work mate about the colour of cushions than bore me rigid with it, that’s a given. However it is important to assert ones heterosexuality in such metro sexual times. Hence hot curry.
which made me decide that just maybe these jeans need to be distressed so it looks like that hole is intentional.
¼ tsp Freshly ground black pepper
You can visit South Africa and Namibia today and find true and pure tribes with their traditions in tact - none of these mixed blood 'tribes' that 'survived the onslaughts in the 'other continents.' In Southern Africa a Boer is a Boer - not half white and a Zulu is a Zulu, not a half Xhosa or half black.
Saturday was spent at Wake Junior High School, the Head Teacher picked me up from Tom’s home to take me to school. All students cycle to school, whatever the weather. (They have all-in-one rain capes for the rainy season.) Even Tom cycles to work. The school day starts at about 7.30am with clubs, which are run by the staff. These may include Kendo (traditional sword fighting), Judo, tennis, soccer, baseball, table tennis, and science. Academics start at 9am until 4pm, then, more clubs or activities until 6.30pm. Staff are contracted to work until 9pm and even if they have finished their paperwork earlier they have to stay until this time.
I really like how she turned out..until I uploaded the card on here and it looks like she is wearing a granny dress, lol.
Some other blogs that I recommend for discussion of language teaching are:
"How is that humanly possible?"
A question I have been asked a few times down the years (I’ve done at least one charity event every year since 1985) and the main reasons are the charities are personal or ones that support/help young people, like this year’s one the Make-A-Wish Foundation. Plus I love helping others as much as that sounds like a Miss World reply!
It's almost 11pm. My children are all asleep except for the older two. Jesse is waiting for me to finish my blogging and internet reading, and Travis is falling asleep. Jesse will be sleeping in my bed tonight (along with Nathan, who is still breastfeeding). My wonderful husband, who normally shares my bed, is in Chicago again - working hard for his family. Actually, at this moment, he's enjoying the Ohio Buccs football game. (Of course he'd be enjoying it more if they were winning :)...
In order to dance the approximately 6-minute hymn, we still had to garb up in full Tantric dance gear; all this in one of the empty classrooms with no mirror. But I'm not complaining, it was my first Charya performance of any kind. Raju was dressed in the yellow gown of Manjushree; I wore the red attire of Vajrayogini.
As before, there will be one prize for the best review on amazon.co.uk, and one for the best review on amazon.com. And to give you a chance to read the book of your choice and post your review, the closing date of the competition will be extended until 31st October 2011, giving you two months to get your horn (I mean your head) around it.
After I took my walk – I did sit down and do several pages of editing before going back to bed. I slept as sounds as I am allowed (stupid brain) and woke earlier then I have in a long time feeling more refreshed then I have in a long time. I have already done my walk for today and feel awake and focused.
Then the bass player showed up and said he was going to play the guitar instead. He didn't know how to play the guitar, but the Heir could show him, surely. By July. He'd got to talking to his friends and the drummer that played parts of Aerosmith songs was going to re-join.
Okay, I LOVEEEEEEE sex… but, not like a hungry man who’s just trying to get as much sex as possible. I love the ART of sex.
I say "we" despite not being white because I believe Singaporeans are like that too, although we definitely have less of this complex than Americans. I don't blame the Americans, it is their media which made them this way... Shows like Oprah, for example.
Add toppings and return to over until cheese is melted and golden.
As he was heading to bed one night he says, "I have much more better grammar than George and Harold."
Ava - Diamond White Size 6
8. You see a gorgeous girl at a party. You go up to her and before you say anything, another person come and tell her: 'I'm rich.. Will you marry me?' and she goes with him. - That's competition eating into your market share
Similarly, continuations are much less likely to receive extensions than patents without any ancestral history. (78% of patents with no ancestry have extension
AKU TAK TAU NYAH!!
1. Cover your buttons with fabric
This new book was based on a good idea – a great one even – but I was so down on myself and my writing that it just wasn’t working for me. I contemplated walking away from writing altogether, more than once.
Secretariat!
For me languages are tools of communication, codes, beautiful codes; nothing more, nothing less; no language is superior than another.
They are ready to be boiled in steaming hot water. When boiled they looked like these, appetising enough to eat them on the spot. Along with the Wantons are boiled Choi Sum (Brassica parachinensis), in English, it is also known as “Flowering Chinese Cabbage” due to the yellow flowers that comes with this particular vegetable (Wikipedia). Look at that astonishing textures of the Wantons, the wrappers contoured to their fillings and nice painted Wantons.
There was lots of family, food, laughs and shopping ~ and it you want too much info ~ lots of puking. BOO!
they needed time for rejuvenation.
Gather them in their dozens
My young self, you think that you are a crossdresser but you aren't. You are going to spend the next 20 years struggling with this before finally realising that you are transsexual and have to act to become the person that you are inside on the outside.
It has been almost 3 weeks I did not see any blood stain on my pantyliner. What a relief! I am praying for a smooth delivery and a healthy baby. I hope I don't have to endure anymore 'complications' till September.
Another enjoyable book in this series. The mystery was very involved in this book. I am not really liking that AJ and Jake are so off and on. I do however like that we got to know the characters better and I can say that I loved the ending. Looking forward to reading the next in the series as well.
My sheltered palate stayed with me for a long time. In my late teens and early 20s, I dated a guy whose family was from Spain. They liked to go to Spanish seafood restaurants but I didn't like to eat fish, not even breaded and fried. Needless to say, I didn't win them over.
Plans for a sunrise viewing were cancelled due to lack of energy!
I explained this to Dr. S. and I watched his face soften as I told him we had decided to continue the pregnancy. He sat there for a moment with a slight smile on his face and then said, “I’m proud of you. I’ll be honest with you that most people actually do choose to terminate. I think you’re doing the right thing.”
With the semantics out-of-the-way, can we determine if a ruling on Obamacare is judicial activism or proper judicial decision-making? The answer is yes. By definition a conservative ruling would be proper decision-making. To make a conservative decision is to maintain the constitution as designed and intended by our founding fathers. A more liberal decision by the court to expand the definition of the commerce clause would be judicial activism. Therefore, the “correct decision” or “non-judicial activist decision” would be the more conservative decision.
When Cassia turns 17, she finds out who her "Match" is: the boy she will marry. And, she is shocked to find out it is her best childhood friend! But, later, when she sits alone to review his file (on a type of computer), she is shocked to see an image of a different boy... another boy she knows. Now, her heart starts to tear apart as she is torn between the two boys.
A neighbor woman yells outside the plastic curtain, asking what's taking them so long and whether they shower hair by hair. Laughing Dan Dong yells back that he has twelve toe to scour.
Winner will be picked Sunday January 15th.
The Nimon could use an artificial black hole as a gateways from planet to planet. This technology was effective but not energy efficient. Due to their high energy needs, the Nimon undertook migrations they called the Great Journey of Life. Usually, one Nimon was sent to a planet, representing themselves as a god with advanced technology where it would construct a maze-like Power Complex, a building-sized labyrinth of circuitry designed to generate a new black hole which it then used to transport more Nimon to the planet. The Nimon would then drain that world dry and move on.
Christian started reading early. When he was four, he read “The Monster at the End of This Book” (with lovable, furry old Grover). At first I thought he was quoting it from memory. Four thousand repetitions will do that for a kid. But his reading repertoire expanded quickly, so I knew it was for real. He liked stories so much that he began writing his own as soon as he could hold a pencil. The first one I remember was about a boy who fell into a large bottle of soda. A giant drank the soda, swallowed the boy, and when he burped, the boy came out in a bubble. The story was complete with color illustrations. As mothers do, I kept it for years, but in one of our moves I packed it along with more of his early papers and sent them to him. If I still had it, I’d probably frame it along with a print-out of his recent article in The Washington Post.
I am astounded and amazed at her depth of knowledge of baking..cooking etc..
This is Kilpatrick's Southlake house. Here's another note from today's court proceedings: "Kilpatrick is shaking his head now as Groner talks about Kilpatrick's million-dollar home and his lavish lifestyle in Texas."
Girl Scout 2: My mom was right. You are a big jerk!
posted by doug Fitch at
Name: Signe
Now, I know that using candy is a controversial issue in some classrooms, but I personally believe it's a great way to motivate students and to instill in them the idea that math is super fun! So, I made these pattern strips to be used with Valentine M&M's. I am going to buy the M&M's, have my daughter sort them (while wearing gloves, of course), and make up Ziploc bags for the students in my small groups. Every time I do something like this, my children inevitably say that math is the best subject. Let me know what you think about using candy in the classroom.
‘Oh’, he replied, sounding disappointed. ‘I thought you were going to read me a story.’
SH: So why didn't you remind me?
-Finally, each week you will have to spend a little bit of time planning which deals you are going to partake in. To do that go to one of the following blogs and view the "match-ups" for the week at your favorite stores.
The story is unpleasant so I will make it brief: a few Sunday nights ago (Sunday night being the worst time to buy a vintage sewing machine on eBay since it's the site's most popular time) I bought a newly-listed Elna Lotus as a Buy it Now -- a terrible idea nearly all of the time, since you'll (almost) always be paying more than you would in an auction.
She would like to clean the wall hanging and would like to know how best to do this.
2) Extensive seismic readings were taken by Columbia University during the World Trade Center attacks of September 11th – the Precambrian bedrock of Manhattan was rumbling as the two towers collapsed, and this showed up on Columbia's seismometers. Sound artist Mark Bain then transformed this information into audio files, so you can actually listen to the wounded, melancholic howl of Manhattan as its two tallest buildings fall to the ground.
big spenders,
No side-effects no drugs good alternative to smoking cessation products containing nicotine or medications
Once it was over it was finally time for everyone to go home. After saying goodbye, I found myself alone in my flat to take stock of the day. Now normally, for reasons I won’t go into, Christmas is a hard time of year for me and something that I don’t really get into that much. But this year was different, this year I had the best Christmas that I’ve had in a long time. And I think it was because I was with people that I cared for, and that cared for me back. Which if you think about, beneath all the presents and the sense of occasion, is all what Christmas really boils down to.
Well, partly (the Viking would say mostly, but I'm still telling him my obsession will get better), Starbucks is to blame. Damn their comfy chairs, alluring coffee smell, and the staff knowing my name and being all nice to me in several different locations in several different languages! That's how they get me, they have nice-smelling, polite people and a place for me to sit down while I drink my umpteenth coffee of the day. Damn them. Sometimes there are even tables. Can you believe it?
Wind blow cold
They learn how to treat their friends and family by seeing how you treat yours.
They fully deserve to be where they are in the table (5th – behind Spurs!), and I hope they finish well in the last two games of the season. And may Cisse keep scoring unbelievable goals.
After talking with my teens about this today, I realized something after nearly 25 years: a stranger possesses just as much power, and quite probably more power and influence to save the life of someone contemplating suicide. When friends fail, or when friends are not enough, or perhaps when friends are too familiar to be truly heard, then maybe it's the stranger who can change everything. If only someone had asked her to dance. If only someone had noticed the girl sitting on the bench and sat down beside her and said, "Hey." If only someone on YouTube had said "it gets better."
1 pkg (8oz) cream cheese, cubed
Hot dog buns
We tried them with both Reeses Peanut Butter Cups and M&Ms and I liked the M&Ms a lot better. Both are yummy, though.
At this point you might be "fussed-out" from rolling, cutting, decorating, and eating fancy cookies during the December baking season. These Raisin Pecan Spice Bars are a perfect January treat: they are simple to throw together and their warm spices, nuts, and dried fruit make them very welcome if you're caught in deep winter's chilly grip.
Gold: Squatters Wit, Utah Brewers Cooperative, Salt Lake City, UT
Here are some shade comparison swatches for you; MAC Cockney is a good example of a 'true' red, Berry Rich just looks pink next to it! Sleek Cherry is definitely darker and a bit more purple, with Inglot no. 58 being the closest match. However, I find Inglot to be a bit more of a raspberry pink, whereas Milani is leaning towards strawberry; does it make any sense to you or are you just picturing a fruit salad now?
their workers. Guacamole has replaced turkey as
The box has an attractive black and white print, though the idea is that you won’t be looking at it all the time. The clear window is a nice touch and helps in identifying contents. Do check the height, though – these boxes did not fit under an older wood-frame bed we have, though they should be fine under a standard metal-frame bed.
I'm not normally much of a resolution making type of gal. Sadly, I am not that good at follow through. I just have no willpower (I mean, hello... my bum-bum can attest to the lack of willpower when faced down with a delicious warm gooey brownie....). But this year I thought I'd make some resolutions that I think I can actually achieve....(with an exorbitant amount of prayers).
9th - caught out in a thunderstorm
A little trick: If you have pictures of flowers you want to paint like this, just use a computer programm to blur your picture a little bit or just squeeze your eyes while looking at it. In both cases you will get undefined but bright spots of colours. Take the main colours which are to be seen and just paint a rough image with them. At first the lighter colours and afterwards adding the darker ones (like always with water colours). Don't be too accurate (Yes, i love this sentence ^^), all you want so show with your picture is to be found in the colours you use.
The guy behind the paint counter didn't really respond. And I don't blame him. How the heck do you respond to that? She was asking him what taupe is. And telling him to mix it for her. Good luck.
When asked for clarification on Ammons’ statement, FAMU Chief Communications Officer Sharon Saunders responded in an email that “the Crestview satellite is expected to open this fall as originally planned.”
Stage Door Cafe
Hey i tried to vote for you for both best parenting and best humor but shows i voted already the last time you asked. So i guess i cant vote just wanted to let you know that i voted already. I hope you win i love ready your blog.
Merlot Grape Seed Eye Cream
In autumn 2011, Stanford University opened up three of its classes to anyone in the world with an Internet connection. One of the professors of these classes, Sebastian Thrun, marveled when over 160,000 students enrolled in his course. The experience shocked him enough that in January, Thrun quit his teaching position at Stanford and founded Udacity, a startup whose goal is to offer low-cost, high-quality education to people across the world. The online revolution was on.
Jesus is alive. He was crucified and buried, but on the third day He came back to life! Since Jesus conquered death, hell and the grave, you have nothing to fear if you have put your trust in Him. His resurrection from the dead guarantees your eternal life with the Lord in heaven. This is truly good news to all who believe!
No one has a character like that so we never fight.
He has a magnetism that is irresistible, a dashing demeanour, also has a great accent and apart from that, he seems to have a variety of intangible qualities in his personal charm arsenal.
Do I push for good over evil even when the sun isn’t out? Or do I wait for God to part the clouds?
If you're new to Ooh La Frou Frou, welcome!
So, I think that’s all that’s gone on for the past week. The school year’s wrapping up, so I might not post much for the rest of April. Anyway, updates soon to come on the movie review post. (posted with Monty Python and Dodgeball added) And I’m out. Enjoy yourselves in whatever you’re currently up to.
friend your way and sometimes it doesn't.
‘Mr Sheridan then asked the witness if there were any emails between him and Clive Goodman, the former Royal editor of the NotW. Mr Coulson replied, “yes he was a reporter on the paper” Mr Sheridan asked if Mr Coulson had emailed Mr Goodman asking him to “take the blame for the good of the paper” Mr Coulson responded “No, I’m positive – do you have that email Mr Sheridan?”…..’
In terms of makeup, very little newbies. Got myself two new studio blushes from ELF: Twinkle Pink and Giddy Gold. Now the twinkle pink is PERFECT: if you've tried some of the ELF studio blushes, you'll realise that whilst it's they're not chalky at all. "Twinkle Pink" is the perfect blush for daytime, especially if you're still in school and can't get away with ultra shimmery cheeks!
The patterns are quite adaptable but if you wanted to use the same fabric as pictured, you can order kits from Modern Quilt Studio. I love that they've got step-by-step illustrated directions. I'm so visual that I do much better when I can see what I am doing rather than trying to figure it out from a paragraph of directions.
“We know that in other cases in the United States up to 50% of populations were killed by the virus,” he said.
What's even more egregious is that, in their haste to jump into a mud-wrestling pit debate on deregulation or re-regulation, both Chait and Welch run with this theme without even questioning the original premise.
Perfect Vision developed a jerky and arty new wave sound, mixing synth-pop with grinding guitars and pop beats, Gahan-style vocals with intellectual arrangements much akin to early Wire. In fact, imagine if Wire had stayed clear of their late 70's arty-farty experimentation and developed their formative new wave edge, then this is how they would have sounded.
I haven't shot film in ages. I really should finish that ancient roll of black & white film I have in my dad's old SLR. The last time I was in a darkroom shunning photographers using digital cameras, sheesh, it has been about five years now. And those days beneath a big black cloth, exposing large negatives, they are even further back.
There is no plain meat that tastes as good as meat that is cooked on the grill! When you are trying to eat clean and healthy, being able to grill meat is a must! I live in Northwest Indiana and as anyone who knows this area can tell you, we have more winter than summer and the temperature can change by 20 degrees in one day! This makes using an outdoor grill difficult to do year round. This is what makes me so thankful for the invention of the indoor grill!
— Sara Gruen (Water for Elephants)
Chapman states there are five "languages" that people use to feel and express love:
no clue who "breeder" is
I went ballistic. (Because I have told her repeatedly she cannot just “show up” at my house. Her response? “What kind of car do you drive?” (I’m assuming her thought is, “If I see a car that isn’t your car, then I won’t go up to the door.”) I don’t remember what I said, but I there was yelling involved. Something along the lines of “It doesn’t matter what kind of car I drive! You shouldn’t just be showing up uninvited!” I said something about how people pay a lot of money to stay at my place, she cannot just stop by. Blah blah blah. Her response? “Well, if you’d answer your phone when I call, I wouldn’t have to stop by.”
“It might take you a little longer, but as long as you keep on walking, you will reach your destination. Eventually, you’ll be there.”
Necklace: J.C. Penney
Rapport aside, Schock has shown no obligation to spin the narrative into a puff piece. Circo celebrates the wonders of a rich tradition without shying away from the baggage that comes along with it. “The circus is beautiful and harsh,” says Tino. Vibrant colors of aerial performances and small towns in Mexico come hand in hand with the unflinching reality of the children’s lack of education and a “normal” childhood. However, it never occurred to me that Schock was passing judgment on his subjects. It is admirable for a documentary to trust its participants in telling their stories, and to trust its viewers in listening to their stories.
Allie was so excited to see so many entries for this last challenge. Her owner Pattie, is announcing the Winner in the Winner's Corner at the sidebar.
I'm so happy to have some stampy time this morning and finally entered a MOJO sketch on time! This is huge! Haha! I let all the Die-namics do the talking on this card - I started by layering the Circle STAX 2 Die-namics on the Open Scallop Doily Duo Die-namics with some dreamy Indie Chic Citron 6x6 papers. LOVE this color combo! I stamped Dream Big from Big Greetings on one of the Fishtail Flags STAX Die-namics and then sewed it to the circle element. The rose is made from winding two Mini Rolled Roses Die-namics together and I added some Royal Leaves Die-namics underneath before attaching it to the Mini Doily Circles Die-namics. The layout is MOJO240.
American history is an endlessly absorbing tale, and it’s largely one of an anthropological nature. Put another way, it’s about reality, and life at the sharp end. America banded together as a federalised unit because without doing so, there was a danger that the French, the British, and even the Mexicans could stick their noses back in again. The infant country needed a standing army, and a constitution to stop that army becoming an instrument of tyranny: having escaped the British, the founding fathers had no intention of falling prisoner to their own Government.
Aka the ‘This Is The One I’m Going To Get Right Dress’
Here's my Prototype recipe (10 gallons):
The prospectuses of Somerville and Pattison are remarkably similar. They even trotted out the same expert, Lawrence Briant, to say how great the brewery buildings and plant were. Even the size of the breweries was the same: 50,000 barrel a year capacity. Both, based on their contacts in the trade, took a very optimistic view of their future prospects and profits. What could possibly go wrong? As it turns out, lots. Though far more spectacularly in the case of Pattison. Both breweries, however, remained in operation until the 1960's.
This is not so much a letter as it is
Velvet Elvis – Alex Winston (bought her album King Con (from HMV, obviously) recently so that’s where this song is from. I think she released it as a single/part of an EP before though. Pretty decent I’d say)
3. Top with cheese. Place in oven and bake for 45 minutes. Enjoy!
I have a different explanation for the above. She asked a stupid question and the respondent sat there dazed and confused.
I even worked on it at the pizza place we went to for dinner Sunday evening! I felt less self-conscious spinning in a public place where everyone else was playing arcade and trivia games while they waited for their food.
On to my card and I'm sorry but its a picture overload as I just love it!!
4 large artichokes
Oh...it was me. You know, me, the Queen of the Just So. The one that is usually saying, with a big sigh, "Don't you know that you should put the cold stuff by the milk. "And "Why are you putting that there?" Fussing all of my help away.
“Social media effects on productivity in work and home situations: The addictive nature of 140 characters and their spillover to other environments”
Don't laugh at the notion of the mistletoe hanging over the belt. Mistletoe, despite being a parasitic plant, has always been seen as a sign of virility, romance and fertility. The Celts used to think that it would help cure barren animals, and mistletoe berries were often baked into cakes used for religious ceremonies. Most likely, the reason for the connection to fertility and virility is because the white berries of mistletoe look like drops of semen.
They settled in quickly and were eating and drinking within a few minutes of being let out.
Also - if you can participate virtually that would be awesome as well! Just a make a donation and let me know that you are going to participate!
4. Using 3cm, 5cm & 6.5cm cutters, cut the dough and place on greased trays.
Aren’t as easy to understand.
such a boy!
Please do not use any of these images without my consent.
Off we went to the tiny BMI stage to see our favorite South Austin Band, the South Austin Jug band. I wonder why the organizers bother with that stage. It gets drowned out by the Cingular stage. From what we heard, the SAJB was playing their usual quality bluegrass jams. At least we found a tree to stand under. The ACL organizers need to either get rid of this stage, move it or put a tent over the top of it. It's a shame when one of the finest Austin bands is drowned out by some second rate substitute on the big stage.
Proclaim the daylight’s resurrection.
My oldest has had her share of crummy teachers. As a matter of fact, she had one teacher that didn't even know her name at the 1st SEP 3 months in to the school year. She was a whole grade behind in 2,3 and 4th grade, until we got her a tutor in 5th.Every teacher would say, don't worry, she'll catch up.
Current gaming wallpaper:
On the whole - 8/10 (after points dropped - see below)
(One in a series of occasional posts from History Girl Associates. Susan Price gives us a wonderful glimpse of the past through a 21st century breakfast tray.)
B. Country Classic Royal Blue
I love Christmas! For a photographer and fan of all things retro and kitsch, it truly is the most wonderful time of the year. Vacation is coming and I will have time to catch up on typecasting, but in the meantime here are a few signs of Christmas from years gone by.
In November, voters will consider a ballot measure that would change the maximum sentence in California from death to life in prison without the possibility of parole.
The last 2 weeks have been wonderful to say the least. I had a lot of "firsts" and alot of fun.
By this point we’re all pretty much aware that Entourage hasn’t been great since season 3. It built up so much goodwill over the first three years that you kind of just stick around hoping it will get ‘Aquaman’ good again. Season 5 was a lesson in mediocrity with one great episode amongst a bunch of ‘oh yeah, he did make a movie called Smoke Jumpers didn’t he? I REMEMBER now’ episodes.
yes. clearly mislabeled
Many thanks for this opportunity.
I am upset. I am the last preggo standing.
The Church does not approve of any form of artificial birth control. It would seem, however, that in your having four babies within five years of your marriage, you are submitting your body to an almost superhuman test, especially with your threatened affliction of arthritis. The proper spacing of your babies is your responsibility. The mother’s health should be one of the first consideration. Certainly it will be to the blessing of your little ones–those with whom you are now blessed and others yet to come–if you will keep well and strong so that you can give them proper care. (David O. McKay)
So I will leave the two of them to get on with it, unpacking new stock, pricing it, packing it and sometimes making sample with it.
invaded her
* These markers are modular. You can purchase new tips, more ink... even empty markers. Customize them as you wish.
Act like nothing happened, and be happy.
I bought these sample packs and it contains 15ml of the lotion.
Although we moved into this house almost a year ago, Sue and I still haven't put a curtain up on our bedroom window. My office and our bedroom occupy the garret, my office facing west on to King Edward, and our bedroom facing east on to the houses along Henderson. The east window is small and shaded by a large, norway maple in the summer. At this time of year, however, we can see night giving way to morning in the eastern sky. In the past week, it has brightened well before our alarm. I lay in bed this morning, watching the pale gold and green of approaching dawn, torn between the warm body beside me and the temptation of a new day.
Thank you and please vote now and get your supporters to join in. The winners for all best three candidates, ( same order) will be given the best gifts, announced from time to time, from sponsors of this competition. THE DECISION IS FINAL ONCE THE ANNOUNCEMENT IS MADE VIA THIS BLOG.
So the only thing we know is that the powers that were, as I like to call them, have been putting out stories on the Internet about this event.
I guess what I’ve discovered is that while running keeps my weight in check, it is only one factor in my overall health. Running shouldn’t be compensation tool, but a joy in itself. I can enjoy wiser choices just as much as the fun foods, perhaps more. My wife often reminds me, “what you do everyday determines your health, what you do once in while is okay”. As always she is the person of balance, which is a necessary skill to make it in the Long Run.
What might have been and what has been
"Because I'm already married."
Mom likes this on sweet side,so she adds extra jaggery where me love it little spicy and aroma of fenugreek.
I read lazy,patient, elegant, and peaceful…. I am lazy , no question about that, very patient and peaceful till i explode that it, and elegant, well, why not! Let me know if it worked for you!
Pour the ingredients in a cocktail shaker filled with ice. Shake well and strain into a frozen cocktail glass filled with cracked ice. Garnish with a pineapple flag or a single maraschino cherry.
It’s led to some awkward conversations, especially if they have no idea that since out last meeting I’ve lost a ton of vision. It doesn’t help that I do all I can to appear sighted. (Yes, I know. I’m vain. We’ve covered this topic.)
So, hats off to moms, dads, and caretakers everywhere. This is one hard job - but seriously, the best job I've ever had!
Blue print pillow from John Robshaw called Ghana
I watched a Copic coloring video the other morning on how to color fur so I gave it a try for this cute Schnauzer pup of Wendy's. My parents had Schnauzers when I was growing up so this image was fun to color for me. The layout is a sketch I had to try from Merry Monday #9 and the papers I used are in my supply list below:
The difference of number is nothing but the difference of the proper and individual form, and to differ in number is to differ in form. Two men have two different forms, two lions have two different forms. If Socrates and Plato, or any other individual men differing in number, should not differ in essence and form, they should differ only accidentally one from the other, as one man differs from himself, or as Socrates in his old age differs from Socrates in his youth, being the same man and differing only in accidents, not in essence. Socrates should be Plato, and Plato Socrates, and when Alexander rides Bucephalus, Aristotle sits in the same saddle, and it were impossible not to set the saddle upon the right horse, for every horse is the same essentially; and he that stealeth one horse, he stealeth all the horses in the world, because the essence of the one is the same with the essence of the other. There is a difference, indeed, in accidents, but none in essence; there being, according to this account, no essential or substantial difference between them.
Pumped a lot of 'pane down in New Orleans,
We took a little trip this weekend to the wedding of a friend, and traveled some back roads and byways that were new to us. It seemed around each twist and turn in the road, we encountered another peaceful, bucolic scene. The temperatures were cool, it was wet and rainy and the colors of grass and trees, rocks and sky were intensified.
Like the gardenia plants outside my window, my writing will eventually blossom even though there are brown times that crackle with frustration.
• A major collection of photographs of London, including works by Henri Cartier-Bresson, Robert Frank and Irving Penn, has been promised to the Tate Gallery. The collection, which will more than double the Tate’s photographic holdings, was assembled by Eric and Louise Franck over a 20 year period. It comprises around 1,400 photographs taken by 120 photographers between the 1880s and 2000s and is a record of the lives of people living in London. Highlights include Henri Cartier-Bresson’s work, Waiting in Trafalgar Square for the Coronation Parade of King George VI (1937), Bruce Davidson’s Girl with Kitten (1962), Elliot Erwitt’s Bus Stop, London (1962), Robert Frank’s London (Child Running from Hearse) (1951) and Irving Penn’s Charwomen, London (1950). More than two-thirds of the collection is being donated to the Tate Gallery, carrying an estimated value of more than £1 million, while the remaining works will be purchased. A selection from the collection will be exhibited in Another London, opening at the Tate Britain on 27th July. For more, see www.tate.org.uk.
However,for us,all the staff in Hanwood,that is definitely a beginning of some unexpected big joke and lasting bad luck.
We humans are unprecedented agents of global change. We transplant vegetation and animals across oceans, redirect rivers and streams, and alter entire countrysides every day. What happens when we, as a species, disappear from Earth? What will we leave behind, and how quickly will nature forget about us? Particularly interesting (and alarming) to me was Weisman’s analysis of the city substructure beneath Manhattan. It gave me a much deeper appreciation for the post-9/11 peril the city faced that I did not recall being covered in the news media.
This issue just came up while deploying a Sitecore solution to server. CSS or JavaScript randomly fails to load. When I try to browse the CSS file in your browser, I find that the CSS can’t be browsed. In Chrome, I get Error 330 (net::ERR_CONTENT_DECODING_FAILED): Unknown error.
96. Phone. Pick up the phone and talk to someone.
FIRST! I must take a moment to thank all of you who have gotten so active in leaving comments, Liking posts, and newly following my work here. It’s humbling and exciting and makes me want to offer more and more. This Big Gratitude I feel for each of you inspires me every day to live fully: abundantly, full of prana (energy), authentically, and with as much Integrity as I can muster.
Last week, I wrote that as our lives become more text based, we in turn become increasingly less human. I want to expand on that thought by focusing on the idea of the word itself.
On Friday July 14, 1979, I was a 20-year-old American living in Holland Park, London, and working full time at a restaurant called BJ’s Roast Beef on Fulham Road near Chelsea. I was in the middle of a six-month visit to England; no definite plans, just soaking up as much of the British culture as possible (including the beer), before returning home. There was a lot of great music in London that summer; it was hard to choose who to see on any given night. From where I lived it was about a 15 minute walk to one of the main music clubs in West Kensington called The Nashville, a famous pub that from 1976 to 1980 had a lot of bands play there like The Sex Pistols and Elvis Costello. A co-worker had mentioned earlier that we had to see a guy called Lew Lewis that evening, so we met up around six o’clock and started walking toward the venue. We were still too young to have any real problems in the world; whatever we made each week at our jobs we happily spent all of by the next Friday. There were no bills or mortgage payments to fret about, no responsibilities. Looking back, I’m surprised we didn’t float away, we had so little worries to tie us down. As we got closer to the pub, a young man on a bicycle went past us; my friend Keith said, “Hey, that’s Lew Lewis.”
Fact #2: Several months later, Judith was introduced to ‘Sam Flood’ in Miami by Frank Sinatra. Later on she learned that he was actually Sam Giancana, the head of the Chicago mob.
Sixteen degrees whispers the aircondition
Distances:
Specks to range on the window-sills at home,
The restructuring is a part of a long-term strategic business plan ‘Route 2015′, it said.
Now, pop on over to Fantabulous Cricut and see what the amazing Design Team has created for you:) Be sure to come back and join in the challenge!!!
Stop at nothing, indeed.
A symbol of altruism
There are only two explanations for such an insane manner of speaking:
JSB–…the old wisdom derived from Nature?
All the best for a wonderful 2012!
Of course, those flaws are pardonable. Mostly, I was relieved to finally be done with all the research of plans and phones alike…or so I thought.
We are told that this is a free country, that is a joke, we are becoming the terrorist state of which others once warned us, and most frightening is the fact that there are many who welcome it.
- 2 Tbsp cornstarch
In a profession that can feel surprisingly isolating, it felt really good to connect with people who think like me.
makes you dance on the tunes of time”
Tom has managed to get in contact with Dan Standish. Elusive dude. There is a Cellar Door here, a small hut with a bench, all ready to go, quite nice, prepared pot of the terroir. No-one to staff it, the whole operation is only three people. Dan is young, a chemical engineer, we are talking smart. He hits me with the Relic first, pops the cork, pours us both a generous slug and talks about long-chain polymers. Time for E@L's eyes to roll. And the short chains in the white wine.
So what’s the story like- you ask? Well we have NASA and NOAA (National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration) working on a satellite that can be used for military purposes. And then you have Russia with its undercover agents reporting the secret to its country, and them coming up with plans to counter it, and therein lies the fantastic plot. How it is brought forth and faced makes for a great read.
Kiiræ – Leveled my Draenei Mage from 40 to 56, with BoAs. Kiiræ is now dual-spec’d – Fire and Arcane. I am discovering Arcane is good regular, sustained damage, whereas Fire is good burst damage.
Luckily, thanks to the likes of Bier Zwerg, I can buy these kinds of beers, even in a place like Germany where it's really hard to find such "exotics" (bearing in mind I now have a couple of bottles of the new Ambrosius).
Boy have things changed in Sandton. We spent ages just trying to find the car hire place. I then got a Toyota Yaris, 2007 model. I opted for the newest model, not wanting a car that potentially fell to pieces on me whilst driving.
"Tell us about the most beautiful place in the world. Have you been there? Were you ever in the larder, where there are cheeses on shelves and hams that hang from the rafters? It's the place where you can dance upon tallow candles-where you can dart in thin and squeeze out fat."
2/3 C. honey
I find it pretty disappointing that the Mayor of Fremantle keeps repeating the same untrue mantra about Planning Scheme Amendment 49.
Writers, as a group we are neurotic at best. We always ask ourselves why one book is doing better than another. We seem to become obsessed with numbers out of the blue and without a doubt the notebook we carry around always looks like it has been put through the wash and dried in the sun. We watch the world and see characters in our books. We see traits, like the way a person walks or talks as part of a character we create. For the most part, we are observers of the most basic human things that make us human. No matter the genre, we are without a doubt the neurotic observers of life.
I think this photo is self-explanatory, but just in case it’s not, it’s a close-up of a bubbling mud pool.
O my soul praise, His Name
On Blu-ray March 13
Our house was a fixer-upper when we bought it last year. Besides maintenance problems (clogged sewer pipe!) and cosmetic issues (pink, pink, pink!), the house was built as a sort of grand space that meant a small number of large and formal rooms, when what we wanted as a modern family of five was more separation of spaces for sleeping, working from home, and playing. I’m glad I spent so many hours staring at the real estate brochure with floor plan, because I figured out that we could convert the “dressing room” off the master bedroom into our ensuite bath and create an entrance through a hall closet to turn the old master bath into another bedroom. Adding the bedroom, that we are using as a nursery, has been a huge value for us.
did I mention that the Groom's dogs also took part in the ceremony
Note that I'm just using that picture to the right because this lot are nominees, not us: we missed out this year!
Yesterday Tom Watson Mp quizzed Hunt in the Commons, asking: “Are we to believe these emails and texts are the work of a single rogue adviser?”. Watson Hacking at Hunts legs.
Sarah Smith, a bestselling adult mystery author, won both the Agatha Award and the Massachusetts Book Award for best Children’s/Young Adult Mystery of the Year for her 2010 book “The Other Side of Dark.” She holds a BA. and a Ph.D. in English literature, both from Harvard University, and was a Fulbright Fellow and a Mellon Fellow. She was an Assistant Professor of English for several years, and presently works in the computer industry. She is Webmaster for the Mystery Writers of America. She is the author of a three-novel mystery series set in turn-of-the-century Boston and Paris and featuring amnesiac Alexander von Reisden: “The Vanished Child” (1992), “The Knowledge of Water” (1996), and “A Citizen of the Country” (2000). She has also authored “Chasing Shakespeares” (2003) and published a hypertext novel, “The King of Space,” with Eastgate Systems in 1991. Set in Brookline and Boston, “The Other Side of Dark” is about ghosts, interracial romance, and a secret kept since slavery times. It has also been named a Junior Library Guild selection.
Posted on Feb 2, 2005, Source: Informed Comment
Lunch Home stuffed peppers and salad
These once indeed seemed Beings divine,
“My father got nearly arrested by the police once on the road. He was in the car, window open, with a huge bucket of acorns by his side. You see, he collects those in Autumn. And when the bucket is full, it goes into the car.
You got up pretty early this morning, but when I brought you to my bed you went back to sleep for about an hour. Thank you for holding my hand while you slept in my bed. I didn't get to fall back asleep, but holding your little hand was worth it. You may not be the best sleeper, but I wouldn't trade you for one that is.
The prophet Nathan is heralded for having spoken “truth to power” when he confronted King David for having slept with the wife of his soldier Uriah, the Hittite, and sent him to battle to be killed by the enemy. That this little-known prophet risked all by boldly confronting the mighty king makes this a profound story indeed. And yet, nowhere in the Bible do we find Nathan’s “story”–how he summoned the strength to confront the king; how he felt about the king’s conduct; and how King David reacted to him (apart from the few words describing the incident in the as described in Chapter 12 of The Second Book of Samuel). David and Bathsheba is primarily a personal, fictional view of what “may” have occurred in the exchange between Nathan and David.
So I'm taking a break but will be back to bore you silly with holiday snaps, very soon. I promise!
If want to say thank you You just say Mauliate
One of the Institute's current research projects seeks to shed light on the dynamics of patent transactions, on the rationale behind the use of marketplaces for IP rights and, in particular, on the reasons for selling patents by auction. Part of this project has been structured to discover how the issue is perceived by the involved companies.
For a second I contemplated pulling off the road to check if she was okay but just as quickly thought the better of it. Mary was just another of those hopeless cases high school educators encounters every few years while teaching in rural backwaters where the word of God rules everyday affairs and the locals are instantly suspicious of anyone even remotely intellectual. You learn quickly living in the Appalachian foothills of upstate South Carolina outsiders like me do not get involved in gory mess that many of the residents call their lives, even if you have some acquaintance with the family.
How evil/nasty is the enemy? There isn't really one - apart from the evil sickos who start the horrendous wars and conflicts in the world.
Comptroller Thomas DiNapoli says his office has audited and approved 4.7 million refund requests totaling $4.1 billion in 2012, with another 406,000 refund requests totaling $382 million expected to be paid in the coming days.
An Al-Qaida cell consisting of white converts, having infiltrated Denmark from Germany, unleashed a sarin nerve gas attack on the Copenhagen public transport system, killing 98 and leaving a further 2,000 in need of medical attention. Punitive counter-attacks on ghettoes by militias, their ranks swollen by a fresh batch of army and police defectors, caused thousands of casualties as strategic areas of key ghettoes were cleansed of Muslims in scenes of extraordinary brutality.
40 Winnie the Pooh – AA Milne
Reading these books concurrently has been a double loaded barrel, blasting apart fears and attachments--stuff I didn't realize I had; it's been the equivalent of a deep tissue massage for the mind, bringing flexibility where I didn't know I was tight.
it was the look i had seen in your face before. not just with me, but with others. it was your face, but older. your eyes, but a lighter blue. your hair, but less gray.
The rain has refused to stop pouring in Owerri. This is the first Friday in five years when we won’t be looking forward to a Premier league game in the weekend. Twitch FC beat us 3-2 in our home turf last year. We would have gotten our sweet revenge in White Hart Lane tomorrow. We can save our revenge for another time, we’ve got “bigger fish” to fry.
Germaine Dulac, Visual and Anti-visual Films, 1928.
As long as the world has turned, there have been sales pitches. It’s part of who we are. I’m totally good with that. That doesn’t mean that TV product “infomercials” and 1-800 ads aren’t a bit goofy.
Krishna said, “Yajna (Work) comes from Karma (Action), parjanya (clouds/indra/results) come from yagnya, food comes from parjanya (clouds/results/devas), living beings come from food (need food to live). Karma comes from brahma and Brahma from the indestructible (akshara). Brahma which is present everywhere is present in yajna (work). Anyone who deviates from this cycle and lives only for the senses lives in vain.
And towels upon the line;
Since Rosie was around 8 weeks old, we have been taking her to our church, Forks of Elkhorn Baptist Church, in Midway, KY. Nick and I have been members of this church for several years now and, at times, we have been pretty involved in activities there. We have served on church committees, taught a Sunday School class, helped out with the high school youth, and last year, Nick received the honor of being ordained as a deacon. Needless to say, we LOVE our church, our pastor, and our church family.
Being a long distance lover, you live for those weekend getaways. There’s an excitement attached to hopping on a plane and leaving your mundane world behind for the arms of your lover/love.
You can make these cards as simple or as intricate as you wish...cut out the full color images (square, round, or oval in various sizes) with a paper trimmer, die, or scissors. If you like adding dimension to your projects, you can use snips to fussy cut and pop up some of the characters and other elements.
Heat the wok. As the wok commences to heat, the rice, sugar and tea will begin to burn, filling the wok with flavoured smoke. The ribs will bake and at the same time become flavoured by the smoke.
I so looked forward to eating my twix. Because those were love at first sight.
Mattison DR, Cullen MR. Disorders of reproduction and development. Rosenstock L, Cullen MR (Eds.). Textbook of Clinical Cccupational and Environmental Medicine. Philadelphia, WB Saunders, 1994.
“If the canal is dredged from top to bottom, you’re talking tens of millions of dollars. To use a clay capping like this AquaBlock material, it would be in the single digits,” said one of the engineers.
A SANCTUARY REDEDICATION& BAPTISMAL SERVICE will be held on Saturday, February 4 at 1:00 PM. The guest preacher for this service will be the Reverend Doctor David L. Kelly, III, Pastor Christ Fellowship Baptist Church (reception to follow). Also, A CONGREGATION & COMMUNITY MARCH will begin an hour earlier on Saturday at 12:00 PM (line up starts at 11:45 AM).
The U.S. is not immune. According to Sennels, "One study based on 300,000 Americans shows that the majority of Muslims in the USA have a lower income, are less educated, and have worse jobs than the population as a whole."
Now comes the hard part, she has lost a true friend, husband and partner in crime !
Alex Schadenberg - Executive Director - Euthanasia Prevention Coalition
I have decided that in 2012 I will do my best to use what I already have and not purchase new supplies until I have used what I have already invested money into. I think my exception would be if I needed a special trim that I absolutely do not have or if I run of of yarn to finish a project or something like that but for the most part I am going to try and be creative with what I have....kind of like what Laura Wilder would have done. She didn't have a gourmet yarn shop or Joanns to shop at afterall.
Accessories: graograin White ribbon, twill Old Olive ribbon, rhinestones
Spill in the comments!
My yarn came the other day, and I’m really happy with it. The colorway I chose is called “Williamsburg” in “Wool of the Andes”. It’s 100% peruvian wool from knitpicks, and it’s really soft. I haven’t really had the time to start the scarf, but I figure I have a few more months until I’ll need it to keep my neck warm. I want to knit on the plane, but I’m not sure if that’s a possibility.
I am genuinely distraught over the idea of having to be at school 8am tomorrow for a lecture on copywriting. It’s so dull. I have yet to be on time to this class, and for once am planning to make an exception.
May: Sir Arthur Conan Doyle
Their needle-like fangs can inflict deep puncture wounds, and the bite is venomous: a paralysing and necrotizing poison that numbs and eats away at the surrounding tissue, leaving it dead and gangrenous. A bite to a hand or foot will, over the course of a few Turns, will leave it numb, useless and stinking. A bite to the head or neck can easily kill the victim.
Well, that's OK: I can't really think of a circumstance under which you'd have to. There's usually too much beer to be sunk behind the scenes...
Here's what Strange says to a client who asks him why he spends money to rent an office for his fledgling private-investigator business instead of simply working out of his car:
As I've spent a lot of time talking about Kpop lately, I feel duty-bound to post this, and host a discussion about it.
LADY AND THE TRAMP
and wings
There is always this chance as well. If you get an audit letter from the IRS, do not panic. Call your bookkeeper or your CPA immediately! As always keep all copies of correspondence.
Till next time...Happy Stitching!
3. Once the brad is secure you can slide the clip and adjust it so the back of the clip will close.
Before we hide this doctrine away in the attic of our hearts and just tolerate its existence, let’s think about the domino effect that de-emphasizing hell has on the rest of the Christian faith. First, we know that hell is God’s just punishment for sin and it is eternal in length (Matthew 25:31-36). As a punishment for sin, hell speaks directly to the seriousness of our crimes. God has chosen a punishment for sin that corresponds perfectly to the wickedness of our violations. If we diminish the importance of the doctrine of hell, then we diminish the severity of sin and if we diminish the severity of sin then we downgrade the holiness of God because sin is, first and foremost, an offense against his name (Psalm 51:4). Sin would not be as awful if people were the only ones we sinned against, but because every sin is essentially an act of rebellion wherein we choose not to give glory to a holy God (1 Corinthians 10:31), then hell is perfectly just. Going further, if we diminish the seriousness of sin, then we fail to understand the Gospel. If sin is not really as bad as hell says it is, then Jesus’ death on the cross becomes less loving and less sacrificial because our need to be rescued is not as dire as we once believed. Then, if our rescue from sin loses its magnificence, suddenly our motivation for living an obedient life of service is also diminished and we become even lazier in our devotion to the King.
After a some shoveling and a little power washing...
Have your friends collect your records and then change your number
I, who has fallen in love with no other place to
let none ever presume to have my measure.
Proenza Schouler continued in moderation the bold prints they showed for Spring 2010, but with a winter update. The collection began with a barrage of somber looking models painted with scarlet lips, pale foundation, and sheathed in dark plaids, blacks, greens, and fur. Perhaps one of the most impressive parts of the beginning of the collection was the excess of wearable well designed outwear. From updated toggle coats to a line of peacoats lined in dark black, navy, and green fur ending in a cheeky update of a fur trimmed letter jacket. The collection moved into black and white prints splashed with bold splashes of blue , royal purple, and green. Standount babydoll dresses bring to mind a dark moody tragically chic schoolgirl at University PS. In total the collection was a continuing evolution of Jack and Lazaro's distinct aesthetic that has shot them to stardom.
A mixed week. Monday the warm weather beckoned me to the plot. I was able to get another raised bed dug over and prepared for sowing. It was a bit couch ridden to be honest and took a full 2 hours to get to this nice state but that's the fourth of the six beds done now. The other two have kale, sprouting broccoli and overwintering onions and garlic in them so just need a good hoe to get them up to scratch.
for good works. Preach the gospel with burning urgency like you’ve never done
3. Use the tamper to help push the ingredients into the blades.
They have been a handful to care for! Feeding and watering twice a day, changing their litter, plus all my other animal and people chores meant I fell asleep as soon as I was done eating dinner, at 8:30. It’s a good thing most of them won’t be around for very long, the 16 meat birds will be ready for the freezer in 2 months. The 10 egg-layers are going to be the only permanent residents. Here’s some pics of the little darlings. They’ve grown amazingly fast just in the first week.
....so when that voice creeps in again, I'll just pull up this post and remember...
The same is true of the bible. We have to have faith that the authors were writing a true account of all they saw.
So how can we drink the thousand things without sifting?
As my regular readers are aware, we now count ourselves lucky to be members of an unschooling community. We've found some amazing people, and we're having some really good times.
So as I continue about him, think to yourself and try to figure out who it is.
in the horizon bird's eye
Are seen at the hour of midnight damp
Up and down, and down and up,I ran around the house putting the newly displayed Christmas decorations back in their spots. This is the perfect solution for Thanksgiving weight gain.
girls. The online sites are making a great business in this way. Apart from providing dating and networking facility, the online match making sites also provides with blogs, photos, forums, music, journals, classifieds and games. The blogs are published on the net where one can share their views regarding the site. The photo sharing aspect is another interesting feature where one can see each others photo through the website itself.
Gardening can be a mundane and even annoying task when you have a store just down the street. However, it is absolutely necessary to learn how to do your best with it and be able to provide more than just meat for you and yours. Some plant matter can be gathered as a daily task, but you will almost never be able to forage enough to sustain you and everyone else in most areas. This is just the truth of the world we live in; not everyone lives near water anymore, almost nobody has fruit and vegetable plants in their backyards that grow naturally, and it is really difficult to find edible plants in most urban and suburban (even some rural) areas.
Need Holiday Gift Ideas?
**Suppliers is not the word for the lovelies who helped us. There will be many kisses and posts to come about them. I promise. It is the least I can do.
He worried. His teacher said if he made a funny face after receiving the Precious Blood he would be in trouble.
This picture marks their silver wedding anniversary. Apart from them, this picture includes their three children (I'm at the back, behind my dad), and my grandparents. That is, my father's father and my mother's mother! My grandad is the same one that used to dress up as a cowboy! Oh, and you may have noticed the obligatory dog, in this case a German Shepherd called Sable. She was always my mum's favourite, and it would never have occurred to her to leave Sable out of the picture.
But that isn’t the half of it. His new book, The Sign, the latest in a long line of tomes about the Shroud, makes an even more astonishing claim in its 450 pages (including over 100 of footnotes). It was, suggests de Wesselow, seeing the Shroud in the days immediately after the crucifixion, rather than any encounter with a flesh and blood, risen Christ, that convinced the apostles that Jesus had come back from the dead.
Teeny Tiny Ghost
“Le podemos ayudar? Can we help you?”
454110 Electronic shopping & mail-order houses
As previously mentioned, our favourite authors play an important part in our development as writers, especially for those who are just starting out.
I produce this photograph, reproduced from an email from Mr P’s brother, with whom Oz used to live.
9. "You wanted to be a member of the most powerful clique in school. If I wasn't already the head of it, I'd want the same thing."
1 cup dark raisins
This is a great way to learn by seeing a professional do it than by reading a book, plus it will be a fun experience. What better way to spend a nice Sunday afternoon?! So what are you waiting for? Sign up now! For $49 per person, you cannot find a much better deal than that. On top of that, you can win a Flip video camera by entering the drawing online at www.movie-me.com. No purchase necessary and attendance is not required.
Rising is a principally in God’s hands. Psalm 75v 6-7 tells us that promotion does not come from the east or from the west, or from the north and it doesn’t come from the south. It says God is the judge, He raises up one and he pulls down another.
Loomed larger (though immaterial) than a dirigible,
Hi Nikki,
"...A candidate for public office in any contemporary democracy may have to consider what, if anything, to do about "global warming." Candidates should understand that the oft-repeated claim that nearly all scientists demand that something dramatic be done to stop global warming is not true. In fact, a large and growing number of distinguished scientists and engineers do not agree that drastic actions on global warming are needed.
Started to fade away,
I was positively smitten with BM after our first date. He travelled a lot for work but we kept the embers ablaze with texts, emails and *le gasp* phone calls (I abhor talking on the phone and yet it’s all I wanted to do with him). He would tell me about his next great idea that caught the eyes of his superiors and I’d pat him on the back. I’d tell him about the amount of food I crammed back that afternoon and he’d textually stroke my belly. It was a great partnership, equal give and take in my book.
Friday’s FREE Noon Musicale, from 12:15 to 1 p.m. in the Landmark Auditorium of the First Unitarian Society Meeting House, 900 University Bay Drive, Harper Tasche plays original music for lever and cross-strung harps. For information, call 608 233-9774 or visit www.fusmadison.org
Husbands and wives do not have to succumb to the effects of indifference. A few principles can be applied to prevent it from growing to dangerous proportions.
It reads like an experimental novel.
Also returning will be Chrissie Tobas and Theresa Gerber. They will continue as Guest Designers for another month. Isn't this fabulous news? Congratulations to both of you. We are all so happy you decided to give us the pleasure of a little more time working with you.
Southern Brownie Pie is especially good served warm with whipped cream or vanilla ice cream on top. It's also quite good cool.
Four years ago today, I purchased my first new car. I hadn’t known that morning I would own a new car by the conclusion of the day, but it happened. A colleague assured me I could purchase a brand new vehicle for what I believed to be a ridiculously low price. With my friend’s guidance, solid financial reassurance, a huge share of personal apprehension (I once dated a car salesman—need I say more), and the jitters of a first-time buyer, I embarked on the venture. Within three hours, I selected a snazzy “Barcelona Red” vehicle and drove it off the lot; 21 miles on the odometer on the 21st day of the month. Was this a sign or what? I think so. I continue to experience a little thrill of the first day’s ownership every time I drive anywhere in my RED car. Happy anniversary me and RED!
According to the Huddersfield Examiner, Tesco and Kirklees Council are in talks over a deal which would fund a new sports centre on current car parking land at Springwood.
After dating for a year, she became engaged to movie producer, Andrew Form (The Texas Chainsaw Massacre: The Beginning (2006)), on November 4, 2006.
I was extremely humbled by this beautiful gift of art that Patricia created. She captured the true essence and spirit of the farmhouse. Her attention to detail is amazing- from my father's flag flying at the front porch to the antique window trim, to the cobblestone walk, to the bark on the maple (the bark on the maple tree looks exactly in real life as she painted it), to the antique yogurt pot in the front bed... it is all just perfect!
We also have a serious amount of halloween decorations and have of course been buying new even scarier ones for this year.
The depression was quite bad and really it was the patience of Sarah, kind words from my Dad plus various messages and calls from people that came in out of the blue and generally thinking about all the folks that have been routing for me that saw me through.
You probably think, “That’s silly. Of course, I would! Doesn’t everyone say yes
A few brave people come to pour out their heart and soul.
MISS NINA
Karli – Washington
1 t table salt
They say I should just leave it to be, I’m not too sure myself
I try to keep things very simple, as always. If it sounds good and looks good, well, it’s on the list!! After all, we are all professionals and we know what mum will like even if we have to discard a dish that our mum used to make us which carries us back to when we were kids!
No, your eyes are not deceiving you. I made two, count ‘em, two hats in “Blaze Orange,” also known as hunter safety orange. I supposed it isn’t surprising that one can purchase hand knitting wool yarn in such a bright orange. After all, hunters need to keep their heads warm just like everyone else. My older sister hunts deer and she subtly hinted that she would like a hat in orange. I Googled to find a source for blaze orange yarn and, violá! Bartlett Yarns in Harmony, Maine, offers a nice worsted-weight, woolen-spun, 2-ply wool in “bright orange.” Bright orange? That’s something of an understatement. I swear this yarn glows in the dark☺.
The standard cover provides representation costs by registered accounting practices on your behalf, for up to £75,000 in any one claim, arising from:
How bad it does it have to get before Sarkozy wakes up and smells the coffee?
Anyway, that's kind of a summary of all the negative stuff. I have to add that OVERALL we are VERY HAPPY with how well they are doing. We are very, very grateful. It's such a good feeling to be back to the everyday stuff. I do not take any "normal" day for granted. I've learned a LOT about priorities- things that matter, things that don't. Just like any trial, I wouldn't CHOOSE it, but I'm glad for the lessons learned. I'm so glad that Kev is so supportive and by my side- even when he's rarely home. I couldn't have survived the last 5 months without him. I have to say, we make a pretty good team.
swish against me
Climb in behind you is my own perfect will.
If Irans pipeline project (IPI) becomes more viable and the Nations involved withdraw from the Wests (TAPI) project, because of the volatility of Afghanistan, then it will be highly likely that the West will go to War once again. This time with Iran !
What impressed me the most was the world building. Karen created such an amazingly detailed world underneath the sea. I loved getting immersed in it (no pun intended). The legends, the myths, the consequences of love. It was great.
Nowadays samplers are cheap and commonplace, and the
our perfect christmas tree, a superior noble was found and finally decorated.
While lack of fame was enough to deep-six the dilution claim, the Board proceeded to plow through the other dilution factors. It first found that Opposer failed to prove that its mark became famous before Triumph's first use date. It next found that the marks are not "essentially the same," as required for dilution. And there was no evidence that Triumph intended to create an association with Opposer's mark. Balancing all the relevant factors, the Board found no likelihood of dilution by blurring.
Which of the following elements of beauty shown on the video below, do you think Mother Nature, if she were an Obama Marxist, should become the standard for all living things to mimic?
1) Make sure you tell the story. I read articles or books that, when I'm done I think, "what a waste of a great story." Many people are decent writers. I am a DECENT writer. A few are great writers, although not many. But a decent writer can LEARN to tell a story in a way that does it justice that does not waste it.
The sheer magnitude of the evil from my childhood seems too much. Perhaps my forgiveness was a little premature. Perhaps my feeling of recovery is too early. The fact is I haven’t even really looked at the events, I haven’t felt anything yet. It’s overwhelming.
Buttons - Unsure what company
Mulching is so very important for these newly developing garden beds, especially as our dry rolls on. When I do start the regular watering by hand schedule out there, I need the watering to be useful for the newly established plants and not wasted through rapid evaporation. Even if the daytime temps are dropping slightly, it's still very warm outside during the day and the ground gets baked quickly.
Vicki: Maybe we'll check out a refrigerator-truck conversion when we look for our next RV.
More data on those "death-fearing" conservatives
That would equate to an area in the same room, as the size of a small pin.
Have you heard of tiny Melinda Mae,
Like the NC version of this film, it is a dream. The colours are definitely more vivid in comparison but the grain is still perfect and the quality of the results is wonderful. Another amazing film.
Caleb Woodbridge, 24, a clerical assistant from Cardiff who runs his own blog about the smash TV show, added: “Change is a part of Doctor Who and the reason it’s lasted so long is its ability to reinvent itself.
Our Moab is in Utah, south of I-70, close to the confluence of the Colorado and Green rivers.
But dreaming is for moonrise
I want you to lend an ear
In the congruent condition, the word matches the colour in which it's printed:
It's a line in his cv, a medal hanging next to his First World War medal. 'Für Schlesien,' it says. 'For Silesia.' He died in 1968, years before I got really interested in the topic. So I can't ask him about his motivation or his experiences. I do know that - as I've said in last month's blog - he was far more 'German' than my grandmother.
We were alone one night on a long
(18) The overarching principle that embraces and binds together all the elements of historical writing just described is ideology, and in this respect the biblical writers were exactly like their predecessors. As the next chapter will show in detail, non of those writers was ever interested in the past simply for it’s own sake. Their chief aim was to use the past to teach a religious lesson, specifically, that proper obedience to the deity leads to success in earthly affairs, with its corollary about disobedience.
Pancake!
The other major problem with this opening is that, up until the very last sentence, it could be from any story. Jessica might wake up, brush her teeth, and then solve a murder mystery. She might wake up, brush her teeth, and get sucked through a wormhole into a parallel dimension. Or she might wake up, brush her teeth, and battle a hungry zombie on her way to school. Until the very end, we just don't know.
Continuing with Bob’s slander of Fr. Olivieri, the Commissary General of the Congregation of the Holy Office (Inquisition), I would ask the reader first to read the section in Neo-Geos Come Unravelled to acquaint himself with the scurrilous charges that Bob has leveled against this Catholic priest. In his latest rebuttal we find Bob defending his slander thus:
A quick explanation for those who are not familiar with Weight Watchers (WW). The whole thing is based on points, which I'm sure you already know. Similar to counting calories. But you can also "earn" points through activity, called Activity Points (AP). Once you've earned an AP you have the option of "eating" that point. Lots of different opinions out there about whether or not you should eat APs but most of the time, I eat mine.
She even added a letter for every.single. item. How cute is that!!
2. Luck Will Find You
- A 10-year-old Norwegian boy visiting his father in Williamsburg was released from a hospital Tuesday hours after he was hit by a stray bullet. NY Daily News
Navigating unlikely alliances with her new coworker, two very different boys, and possibly even her parents, Amy struggles to decide if it's worth being a best friend when it makes you a public enemy. Bringing readers along on an often hilarious and heartwarming journey, Amy finds that maybe getting a life only happens once you think your life is over.
We will begin announcing first round results on Tuesday, March 6. Good luck to all the entrants!
I’d like to alter that a bit. Trust fewer but depend on none. There are things that happen in life. Many things. But sometimes, we being humane as we are tend to overlook the lessons learnt from the mistakes. The faith in our hearts make us believe that maybe there are people out there who we can solely depend on. And to some extent that is true. You’re parents, on most circumstances are solely dependable, at least mine positively are. Your spouses, mostly reliable, sometimes by choice other times out of option and generally out of love. Your siblings are mostly staunch, something about the same bloodline I’d assume.
''Given the fact that the media calls any non-Negroid people “white,” and, more importantly, police reports are identifying non-Negroes as “white, these statistics must be reconsidered entirely. They appear to be intentional anti-white manipulations. It is another case of white oedipal liberals trying to destroy the white America.''
“Diseases simply do not respect international boundaries, and if FMD SAT2 reaches deeper into the Middle East it could spread throughout vast areas, threatening the Gulf countries – even southern and eastern Europe, and perhaps beyond” said Juan Lubroth, FAO’s Chief Veterinary Officer and head of the organization’s Animal Health Service.
Recipe for "American Heros":
The daughter Eames stole time with was Jennifer Howard, who married Samuel Goldwyn Jr. in 1950. Their four children included Tony Goldwyn, most famous for playing an evil yuppie in Ghost.
Poor little guy... We're all tired. He's sore. He's sick on top of it all. Things will get better, right?
Love, Jay / The Plug
Another crew who know how to make a goo9d strong beer are the folks at the HardKnott Brewry. Having been given a pair of limited edition bottles at the Ale v Lager evening at the White Horse ages ago, I was eager to get stuck in. Howver, I soon realised I have night in and nights out. I have nights in for recuperating, for doing a bit of out of hours work, for cleaning, for laundry, all that dull stuff, washed down with beers of around 4%. I have nights out for drinking strong stuff that leaves your lips numb. So here was a conundrum. I was home on no evening that was suitable for a 10% + beer. These glorious Cumbrian ales sat untouched, waiting for a Friday night in. It did'nt come. They eventually came on the train with us (Boris hasn't killed that joy) on our way to the magnificent Dartford Working Mens' Club a couple of weeks ago.It was 7pm, the commuter looked at us as if we were bonkers, as we exclaimed the tatsebud beauty that these beers brought with them. Strong, yes. Lip numbing, yes. Drunk making, absolutely. Vinegary and eye watering, not at all. If I manage to get hold of any more of Dave's beers, I better plan some nights in.
Cyber SPACE Progressive Scrap!!!!
Gerald Mason, Vice President EU Affairs for Tate and Lyle said that the answer was predictable.
Email: awards@womenrio20.org
Best of all, clipix is FREE, fast and easy to set up. I think it took me about 10 seconds to get signed up and "Clipping" my favorites to my new boards. Clipix has made it really easy to start clipping, they've even made it possible to simply drag the Clip tool to your toolbar so you can get started in seconds. You can re-clip other people's clips, comment on them, share clips on Facebook and Twitter, and they even have an App, so you can Clip on the go.
11. Hello! 2012
I had already read some of his stories in books I had borrowed from libraries. I was particularly keen to read the stories Roger Corman had adapted for movies - The Masque of the Red Death, The Fall of the House of Usher and so on, and, of course, found them to be very different.
There were so many wonderful things about this brief interlude in my life. I didn’t think about Jeremy Hunt once, for a whole hour. I didn’t think about food, or shopping, or bills, or the European Union – or even the unholy trio of falling annuity rates, manipulated stock markets, and zero interest rates.
In case you're interested, you might interpret these scores thusly:
6. I Was Doin' Alright
Baker by appointment of exquisite things for exquisite people. Having studied a myriad of creative things over the years which have included art and design, textiles, history of art and history of fashion, I’ve discovered my wardrobe is my gallery, my kitchen is my studio, and my cakes my masterpieces. As Marie Antoinette herself once said (or in fact probably never said)…Let them eat cake.
Factories where people thought they would retire suddenly picked up and went overseas. Which is why I circumvented regulations to give start-ups like Solyndra billions of dollars.
Don't give up if you're in the thick of it in your marriage right now! I am so very, very happy! So deeply in love!!! Last evening we went out to a restaurant. Neal got up to go to the restroom and upon returning to the table, he sweetly played with my hair on his way by. And yesterday I was doing a silly dance to a reggae song in the living room and I said, "look neal. I look just like my mom!" We had a good laugh and then he said, "don't ever EVER do that again...." I mean who wants their wives to look like their mother in laws right?
The Inca terracing that you can see in this picture isn’t just a pretty feature, it actually took a ridiculous amount of work to build. Each terrace has three layers of soil and required tons of fertile valley soil and rocks to be carried up the mountain to help crops grow. You can bet it was carried up on the backs of some tough workers.
When maintenance documents come due, the trademark practitioner and the business client should undertake an investigation into the scope of use of the mark before any documents are signed and filed with the PTO. Trademark attorneys should consider reaching out to their clients to start the conversation well before the deadline to file the documents. The TTAB will consider the steps taken by the signatory to confirm the accuracy of the statements to determine whether the applicant/registrant "should have known" about any misstatements.
Whatever else Brooks' fate, fashion death has been pronounced.
Notice the slim layer of framelit behind the image piece? Here’s how…
As a result, I've joined the Medical Reserve Corps and I'm excited for my first event this Friday for a Medical Outreach were putting on for a rural community in Nevada.
like trains on quality speed.
Thank you for your question Katie. Let me begin by acknowledging that I am not an expert in the fiels of fifteen year old boys. In fact Katie, putting aside the question of how to get boys to like you, I don’t know how to get boys to like me.
Her debut came in Le Bal in 1931, a French language version of a William Thiele German film. Over the next few years, she appeared in numerous frothy pieces; films such as Billy Wilder’s debut Mauvaise Graine (1934), Quelle drôle de gosse! (1935), I Like All the Women (1935, with Jan Kiepura, no less!) and Mademoiselle Mozart (1935) before she got her big break. Her Marie Vetsera in Anatole Litvak’s immortal version of Mayerling (1936), which she shot when she was still only 19, would turn her into an international star and see Hollywood come a-calling a year or so later. In the meantime she was delicious in Jacuues Deval’s naughty but nice Club de Femmes (1936) and then in a string of melodramas for her husband Henri Decoin which are unavailable to the English-speaking world, such as Abus de Confiance (1937) and Mademoiselle ma Mère (1938). Off to Hollywood and The Rage of Paris (1938), in which she was delightful, but unlike Simone Simon, she didn’t stay and returned to France. Two more iconic roles in Duvivier’s Battement de Coeur (1940) and Leo Joannon’s Caprices (1942) followed (neither of which sadly are available in English friendly versions) and then the war took over.
Saturated self-portrait: Blake, nice guy, class clown, always trying to get a laugh, not sure where to focus.
The morning started out with a special breakfast of turducken canned Pug food. Have you ever had this stuff? It looks like vomit and tastes even better! I give it two paws up for sure.
Just exiting the building was a group of 20 or so walkers who had stopped off for lunch, so the staff were somewhat frazzled but otherwise very friendly and very polite - great to see. On at the bar was Harviestoun Bitter & Twisted and Deuchars IPA, but I managed to get the last taste of the Adnams Sole Star - a malty low alcohol beer (2.7%), but with a decent bitter hop kick at the end, not bad at all. My soup and sandwiches came really quickly and I sat in the small bar/snug away from the main restaurant (with the TV off - it is possible!), looking at the pictures of the Water of Leith and Colinton Village.
if I let the Tylenol go longer than four hours and not take it, then I really start feeling like crap again.
I’ve included this photograph for the purpose of comparison. The people at the back do not get smaller or lose a couple of inches in height. The proportions of their faces remain the same. You don’t suddenly see a tiny face because someone is standing a little further back.
This series by Sue Grafton follows a female private investigator, an ex-cop. She was one of the first major female protagonists I remember reading. Even now, she's a stronger female character, who doesn't do the stupid things some of the current female protagonists do.
And kids, with their pockets full of allowance,
Spin on blindly in the dark.
When: March 6, 2010. Be sure to arrive between 8am and 9:30 as the breakfast food needs to be cleared out in time to make way for the lunch crowd.
We have been working like little beavers on our home and it is pretty much at an end and we can step back into life with a pulse.
Now it could just be a anonymous commenter that wants to alert folks to a good deal. Or it could be the website owner trying to drive commerce, which is sorta fine, too. Sorta.
On Sunday as we all sat at our table binge drinking Lees Bitter, a couple of young girls came in. I say young, but I don't mean of illegal drinking age. After a little confusion which saw them being diverted from the Gents, they nipped into the Ladies, did whatever was needed and then came out and had a quick confab. It was clearly along the lines of "Should we buy a drink?" There was obviously no consensus reached (or maybe it was a compromise) as they approached the bar and bought one soft drink, which was quickly consumed. Now our pub is in the middle of nowhere and is quite relaxed about walkers coming in purely to use the facilities without being encumbered by any embarrassment about peeing and pissing off, but I wonder where that line should be drawn.
That’s negotiable I once made an omelet that my kid wouldn’t eat and when we put it on the floor the dog backed away from it.
Anyway, on to the card. I have used a TH stamp and then used stamps from a Kaisercraft set and put on 3D pads to add depth. I have distressed all the paper and then added blue twine. As easy as that!
The Raiders were ahead and then, miracle of miracles, this appeared! Dinner! Now keep in mind, Alex had been feasting on crusty baguettes and home-made turkey soup along with a fine Cabernet, but with the combo of a Raider win and food, life was good once more!
What do you think? What do you do with this type of memorabilia? Keep it in a box for your children to discover someday? Trash it? What would you do?
People, please. Obama is neither the second coming of Jesus nor the Antichrist. He does not possess the keys to the land of Utopia, nor does he have an inside track into the 7th circle of hell. We will not be forced into a One World Order, and he probably won’t re-establish the U.S. as the Most Powerful Country In the World. He is not going to fall under Nancy Pelosi’s power, nor will he be eaten for dinner by Putin and Medvedev.
We concentrated on 3 outfit changes to begin with and, as time ticked by, we decided that another shoot – possibly outside on location – would be needed in order to update her fashion portfolio and we will be shooting this soon.
It’s an old book. It was released in the mid-90′s, but that didn’t take away from it. This guy has lived a full-throttle life, and has cut his own groove, forged his own relationship with God, his own ministry and his own legacy. It was especially encouraging for me to read it, when I think about my own kids and the way that they are growing up. I like the example that the Graham’s have set.
No, our family never sat at the dinner table, throwing food at each other. No one would have wanted to clean it up. This had nothing to do with the dinner table. This was about the art of stealing food and then laughing in your face. I’ll explain.
But the Deputy Minister for Interior, Tasneem Ahmed, dismissed the transporters’ claims.
BLITZER: We’re going to take a quick break, but we have a lot more to discuss. Coming up, the debate questions go to space, the final frontier.
This past week hasn't been too bad though, I've gotten some time to escape the madness. Twins club this week was awesome. We had a speaker, John Mascazine - who is an expert on twins- he was really interesting and brought up things I hadn't thought about before, as far as educating the boys. It got me thinking a lot. He wrote this book:
Green chili 2-3 (chopped)
I had the Icon version, a 1.6 litre engine with heated leather seats, leather steering wheel and gear shift. I can remember the smell of the new leather, the feel of the shifter in my hand, and the sight of the slight bulge in the centre of the bonnet, which when sat in the driver seat, gave a wonderful waved outline that made it feel like you were driving a classic Aston Martin or something. And as it was Sunlight Silver it shimmered when the sun shone.
So, W.S.J.D.? He says he's working on new technique. Trying to prepare himself to compete toe to toe with the sports new speed crew. His belief is that at 28 he is still young enough to come back from four years of non competition to run not only 9.77 as before, but to get into the 9.5/9.6 range necessary to compete with the world's current cream of the crop.
This is surely the world biggest articles pack collection, with more than 400,000 articles in a pack! After downloading this huge plr article pack you will have at your finger tip, every possible contents that you will ever need for your website and to market your web site or products. Start creating thousands of niche targeted content web sites and start generating income from Google Adsense, Selling Clickbank product or promoting CPA Offers. Or you can take simple route to earn some quick cash by simply selling this PLR package "as is" for any price you wish. Estimated value of this 400,000 PLR Articles is easily (worth over $800/-)
1 pkg gnocchi (I loved the one from Trader Joes)
"Jackson!" I rummaged in his backpack, looking for the leaking water bottle. I didn't find any water bottle. Instead I found a leaking carton of chocolate milk. I pulled the soggy, disgusting carton out of the bag and held it up. "WHY do you have this in your backpack? Did you really think you could save unrefrigerated milk all day long?"
you have created everything spiritual and corporal
Shirley’s Take:
Finished this up the past weekend. I found myself spending a lot of time doing the mixes, almost too much time that I had to let it sit for a while before wrapping it up. There is a peculiar story with this song that brought it to surface, like I said my dream experiences lately have been raging and they tend to influence me subconsciously, or consciously I don’t know. Probably both.
“Oh, Ev,” Kirsten added. “We were playing Truth Or Dare at the Rock ‘N’ Lock, and we asked Theo if he likes you. Because, you know, he’s always around you. He said that he doesn’t like anyone, he doesn’t like you like that, but you’re his best girl friend. He doesn’t want to date, but if he had to, it’d be you. He said, ‘She knows me better than anyone else, because she’s my best friend.’”
Connie Perritt
has to be discussed among us, but definitely Cuba has legitimate
If you had a busy week and didn't have time to get something, my suggestion is to pass by Feira Rural do Parque das Nações tomorrow from 9h-14h.
"Kapihan @ SCWA" is an annual gathering of parents,teachers and the school administration.In this event,we will be able to discuss all our concerns and suggestions while sipping our cup of coffee and having light snacks.It's also a great way to interact with other parents and teachers of Shalom Crest Wizard Academy.
K (attempting to distract small humanoid creature): “You’ve got an elephant on your shirt. I like that.”
I was actually really impressed with the liquid foundation, it has SPF 12 and it gave such a nice smooth airbrushed finish without even using a lot. The shade was just a bit light on me, but blended in nicely anyway. It did last for the most of the day, but felt a bit greasy and oily towards the end of the day as with a few other foundations i've tried, and just needed to touch up with MAC's Careblend Pressed Powder. There was also no weird smell and comes in an easy to use pump. They describe it as "Always fresh, never cakey or dry. Resists water and sweat. Stands up to heat and humidity. Feels featherlight and flexible all day. Comfortable coverage up to 18 hours. Medium-to-full coverage."
What do you think? Does this inspire you to don a tight leather skirt and hit the town?
I've been on a watercoloring binge lately so I thought I'd bust out my fave color combo - aqua and red - and color the pretty little corset thingy.
Christ. Guide my mind I pray, so I can see the different opportunities that
Another wonderful memory was getting to sing “Handel’s Messiah” twice in my life — once while in college and the second time with a dear friend at Midnight Mass. My favorite song from that movement is the Hallelujah Chorus. I sang soprano but have since switched to second soprano since my voice has changed. This song is gorgeous with a full orchestra.
In brief: all is well, appointment with midwife was postponed (now
Samba Pa Ti comes next. First the original–Santana’s sexy-smooth growling guitar (the guy was like 22 when he recorded that!) followed by Masayoshi Takanaka’s brightly upbeat cover.
Finally, the Grand-Daddy quote for the finale:
Second, color.
You can imagine my dismay at my baby being subjected to that for no good reason.
Ikea finally opened in Springvale which is so much closer to me than the Richmond store. So I looked at Ikeas website and found this so off I went to Ikea much to my husbands disgust. Since Ikea opened in Springvale I have been there about 10 times my husband wishes it had never opened so close to us..
STEP 2: Heat up a frying pan or skillet with a little oil on the burner on medium-low heat. When the oil is hot enough, put the bread that has been dipped in the egg in the hot oil one at a time and let it fry till it is golden brown.
I am always so surprised and pleased after blocking. I swear, it is black magic.
Poems are made by fools like me,
Sadly, the shade they recommended to me was out of stock, but I happened upon this little quirky beaut. The Look Beauty Double Hit Lip (love the name!) in Citrus Kick (Shade 002).
Government, conversely, is pissing away more money than ever. They promised to cut back but the truth is a stranger to them, as to all politicians. As Merryn Somerset Webb pointed out recently, they (that's you and me) are paying interest on the interest they owe. And by printing billions they are punishing savers and transferring wealth from the poor to the rich.
Jesus then said to those Jews who believed in him,* “If you remain in my word, you will truly be my disciples, and you will know the truth, and the truth will set you free.”
But I've been thinking a lot about this one lately. This is my brother Adam. I seriously love this kid more than I can even say.
Found some pictures online, not sure if they’re from yesterday’s show, according to the poster’s they are, thanks to Volkskrant, Jochem Geerdink (photos) and Michiel van Abbe, forgive me if I accidentally left your name out with regards to the pictures !
Labour sternly as a duty;
You and I, you and I,
It is only the lands of the white race which are under siege, and it is white politicians who are primarily responsible.
But back to the Whoniverse we go, and boy! was the ending left wide open... dangling ... begging for more.
Steampunk Innovation
On the band front... Why is that the whole weekend it seemed that I could eat, and eat... Then we stopped for lunch on Tuesday at 903 Mills Market. I attempted to eat a salad with chicken on it and some soup.. ummm yeah two bites into it and I was done.. The most horrible feeling ever! I knew I had something stuck. After walking around outside trying to get it to pass I had to just get it out.. Yes you guessed it... chicken.. yuck~! So embarrassing. Josh kept saying cant you just chew more, cut smaller, ect. He tried to be supportive. I have been banded now a year and only had four times that I felt really bad/uncomfortable that was one of them. I hate those times. Especially to be with someone. I rather deal with it on my own. I always talk about the good times on here, so I needed to post a bad time as well.... We all have them Im sure.
I get to get her ready for school, and she will let me do anything to her hair!!!
After so much of our manufacturing base has been gutted, fully one third of it within the first decade of “America’s century” (four-fifths of that during the Bush/Cheney nightmare); and with so many other good jobs herded offshore, it might seem that war and financialization are becoming our primary industries. Plunder and casino, rape and manipulation, destruction and parasitism, murder and financial malignancy…the future is so bright we’ve gotta wear headlamps.
Every night, after the park closes, Disneyland unleashes 200+ feral cats who prowl the Park and keep the roden population under control.
Council officers at Wolverhampton City Council believe that it is the same group of French Travellers who set up camp in Wednesfield last year.
- Sentiment by Craftwork Cards, mounted onto a plain oval and then a scalloped one
So we are moving inexorably towards transition. All because of your pride.
Ooh, I almost forgot: I'm actually wearing a camisole underneath my shirt (I'm not counting that as cheating, since you can't see it). It is so freaking NOT summer here...grrr...
This is the sort of pattern I used to skip over, due to the extreme soccer mom/cheerful conservative midwestern college girl styling. However, I have learned that pattern companies style everything in the most horrible fashion possible, so I just skip straight to the line drawing now. Actually, minus the icky bell shaped sleeves, this is quite a nice little collection of casual shirts. It has a lot of modification potential, too.
The Office on Smoking and Health at the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) counted 45.3 million American smokers, using the NHIS (available here). This number has not changed much in over 20 years. In 1990, the CDC reported that there were 45.8 million adult smokers. But as the U.S. population has grown, the percentage of smokers has declined. In 1990, smokers made up 25.5% of the adult population; by 2010, prevalence had declined to 19.3%.
The normal white male leads in media texts made the existing organization of social relations appear natural and inevitable by assuming a “neutral Whiteness” (Grossberg 244), but Tarantino’s decision to oppose this ideological assumption proves he is able to eschew axioms and precedents, formulas that are commonly used in media, in order to achieve a text that is unique.
Happy Day of Birth my pixie.
3/4 tsp ground cinnamon
I watched the race in 2010 but last year I wasn't down here in Exeter. During the Great West Run 2011 a runner, Paul Smith, became ill and sadly passed away. This year a group of his family and friends took part in his memory. They were running for Sudden Arrhythmic Death Syndrome - SADS UK. That’s what nearly killed Fabrice Muamba. I think perhaps this was one of Paul Smith’s group.
I help him put the mower in the back of the truck. I say to him "I am very impressed that you would walk all the way over here to earn some money" and I hand him the five ones. He says to me, "My dad says if I want something, I have to earn it". I say to him, "Your dad is right".
Staring at your various body parts may or may not sound like your idea of a good time. In fact, you very well may be thinking to yourself, "Tolly is just a little bit weirder than I previously thought."
family puts the func in dysfunction. What motivates them, what do they
4 celery stalks, diced
Sparkling smiles by Dentist Brown,
Yes, that "Shadows Of The Night". A full year before Pat Benatar made it a huge hit and it won the 1982 Grammy for Best Song.
Photo courtesy of Varis.
1 12-18 pound turkey (I cooked a 16 pounder from Homegrown Meats)
1 plot
For here forlorn and sad I sit, Within the wiry grate; And tremble at th’ approaching morn, Which brings impending fate.
I haven't made pasta for quite a while and I'm really pleased with how this turned out. Definitely a keeper recipe- assuming it tastes as good as it smells.
I might be able to rustle up a plain white t-shirt or looks like a trip to the local op shop might be in order. Wonder what they've got in the line of fake beards?
Confirmation update #1: Damaging winds, Possible Tornadoes, and large hail in NW Texas, south central Kansas , Tennessee, Kentucky, Indiana, Ohio, Pennsylvania, West Virginia:
Heat thrummed under my skin, pulsing, demanding to be let out, making me twist and bend with the strength of it.
When people succeed in profiting on a large scale, they succeed for themselves. When they fail, they fail for many others, sometimes for us all. A large failure is worse than a small one, and this has the sound of an axiom, but how many believe it? Propriety of scale in all human undertakings is paramount, and we ignore it. We are now betting our lives on quantities that far exceed all our powers of comprehension. We believe that we have built a perhaps limitless power of comprehension into computers and other machines, but our minds remain as limited as ever. Our trust that machines can manipulate to humane effect quantities that are unintelligible and unimaginable to humans is incorrigibly strange.
Most of these woes have to do with formatting, but I think that’s just silly. Sure, I don’t really know what I’m doing, but that’s what the free version of Celtx is for. Admittedly I still sometimes have questions about how to imbed a flashback in a scene or how to cut away from one room to another room to show simultaneous events, but generally speaking, formatting is pretty easy if you don’t try to do it yourself.
When is the hearing likely to take place?
As I saw these families and thought about it last night, I was struck by several things:
It was a gorgeous day, and we found our place along the curb just before the parade started.
After escaping from a dangerous cult and the watchful eye of its charismatic leader, a young woman named Martha (Elizabeth Olsen) tries to reclaim a normal life with her family. But the haunting memories from Martha’s past trigger a chilling paranoia — and nowhere seems safe as the fragile line between her reality and delusions begin to blur.
Volunteers come in all shapes, sizes and backgrounds. Most often, the recruitment and engagement of volunteers is on a level playing field – what experience and skill sets are needed at the time determines who in the applicant pool gets the nod. But, some NGOs favor volunteers who've supported the organization financially and otherwise. Some call this "pay to play", and it is an issue not limited to organizations that recruit pro bono lawyers for international assignments. Prospective volunteers need to know and understand the policy of the sponsoring organization concerning expectations of financial support.
If you live in LA and are serious about acting, I know a great acting coach. He teaches a class on How to Audition.Being a great actor isn’t enough.You have to master the art of the audition – showing people you are a great actor.His class is both inexpensive and amazing. I completely credit him with changing me from a good actor to a working actor. His name is Robert D’Avanzo 818-508-0723. Ask about his 6-Week On Camera Audition Class. He’s the best kept secret in town. And he’s AFORDABLE!
To try to summarize Synecdoche, New York, while maybe not a fool's game, it's at least a considerably more reductive one than summarization normally, by definition, already is. But anyway, Caden Cotard is a theater director who, at the beginning of the film, is staging a production of Death of a Salesman with an all-young cast. He is married to Adele (Catherine Keener), a painter of very small pictures, and has a daughter, Olive (Sadie Goldstein). At his theater, he has a flirting relationship with Hazel, the girl who runs the box office (Samantha Morton), and is possibly worshiped by his lead actress Claire (Michelle Williams). As Caden finds himself crumbling in the face of Hazel's considerable charms, his marriage is slowly coming undone, helped along in part by Caden's exhausting hypochondria, and also by a revelation from Adele at their couples' therapy that she'd fantasized that Caden was dead and she was free to start over, and also by Adele's dismissal of his production of Death of a Salesman, which in fairness is pretty ridiculous, as just a waste of time he could be spending on creating something new and vital and his own.
1 dried chipotle pepper
What is your acu like? Anyone been given any medicine?
1 tbsp finely chopped tomato
....Before I continue, I would like to thank my speech witer, Bawbwa Walters, for witing a speech with little words that I can pwonounce. She took a wittle time off from kicking Wosie O'Donnel's fat butt. I gotta give her a wot of cwedit there, cause I wouldn't know where to start. That fat bwoad's all ass! Ha-ha-ha! Well, here in Mr. Bush's Neighborhood, we find that vewy funny!
Check out our "Classes" page at the top of the screen for more information.
Using a Wacom tablet, I carefully "cut out" the car from it's background. Placed the car on the beach added texture, a layer mask, color burn blending mode, drop shadow and voila - Truly goes for a swim! (Actually, the swim is over. Now where did I put that towel...)
It's called a "thought experiment" because it can't physically be proved. (Luckily for the cat.)
Just squeeze (USE ALL YOUR STRENGTH WTF) the silicon into a plastic bag with a pretty cream tip. For me, I'm lazy so I stuff the entire silicon tube into the plastic bag and squeeze it out right away.
I think I read somewhere that he had a number of iPhones. So why isn’t there a backup file for the phone? And why haven’t they tried to recover the data right from the memory?
* A place for everything
grabbing my grandma, and spinning across the floor.
I've been intrigued by this new table for quite some time: a Japanese former Alain Ducasse second at the Plaza with seven years under his hat, the former Gerard Besson space, now a minimalist zone serving studious, classic and good looking French gourmet cuisine.
Hopefully we took a few notes from yesterday to apply to today’s program? Any problems tumbling around? Did you do it gracefully or like a desk/office jockey?
“What about Fight Club?”
I've mentioned before that I used to be a backpacker. I've spent summers in New Mexico and lots of weekends year-round all over the Appalachians. It was a time in my life where I've never felt so free, so strong, and so in-tune with who I am as a person. It's amazing what you learn about yourself when you are pushed down to your bare bones, and I've been reflecting on that a lot lately. Every day of my trip, I wrote in a journal, and I've been reading a lot of my old journals lately. On the top of every new day in my trail journal, it says "Nothing is worth more than this day". The journal is full of quotations I picked up from the people I hiked with, because we clung to these little sayings to get us from one place to another, from one challenge and up and over the next. There was another one that one of the rangers I hiked with used to write on letters to us -- "I will be there in the morning, remember who you are".
one that looks as if it was attached to the end of a grand scaled piece of drapery,
If you have a complaint against your spouse, turn it into prayer. Begin to pray for exactly what your mate needs. Pray for his or her heart. Pray for their attitude. Pray for your spouse’s responsibilities before God. Pray for truth to replace lies. Pray that forgiveness would replace bitterness. Pray for a genuine breakthrough in your marriage. And then pray for your heart’s desires-for love and honour to become the norm. Pray for romance and intimacy to go to a deeper level.
Our boot camps were out of this world. I wanted a good butt kicking, and Eva delivered. Naturally, I was nervous. Everyday was a new kind of challenge. I LOVED the surprise element and never knowing what the next exercise was. The day of the 100′s will be burned into my mind forever. I remember when she first said 100 reps, I thought she was kidding so I chuckled. Then when I realized she wasn’t kidding, I was scared but gave it my all. My favourite 100 reps was for the abs. The most challenging was the pushups.
Luxury Comes With Health: The Comfort and Benefits of Home Spas and Whirlpool Tubs
You have beaten the odds.
After arriving aboard a pick-up truck wearing a black dress and turban, Beatrice Stockly removed the garments before boarding a helicopter that had left Burkina Faso early on Tuesday.
Wooden/MDF/Glass Surfaces from RM5.00 - RM10.00 at various sizes
I’m not a happy chap right now. I think I’m generally pretty tolerant, but every now and again, something tips me over the edge and I become fed up.
“I think about it every day. It’s the worst thing I’ve ever been through,” Mr. Neesmith said as he stood in the doorway of his home. “In two minutes it just went bad. If you ain’t never shot nobody, you don’t want to do it, I’m telling you.”
This morning I whipped through 2c of cream then put it in the icecream maker. Once it was pretty much frozen I added about 12 oreos broken up to the mix.
~Malcolm Forbes
Plus I don’t know if anyone would really give a damn about anything I have to say in any form of art.
When one of the strangers - beautiful, haunted Akiva--fixes his fire-colored eyes on her in an alley in Marrakesh, the result is blood and starlight, secrets unveiled, and a star-crossed love whose roots drink deep of a violent past. But will Karou live to regret learning the truth about herself?
She ended up having a huge infection in her tonsils and lungs that we weren't expecting to find, so we were thankful the surgery happened when it did...it was rough on her...more so than I was expecting...but really, how do you plan for something like that with a baby?? When she comes out of anesthesia, she is a thrasher...I learned this on her two previous MRI's...well, add a misplaced feeding tube, and four surgical procedures, and you have one UNCOMFORTABLE child. She was extremely upset for about two hours, when suddenly bright red blood came streaming from her feeding tube. They Xrayed her to find out that they had put so much tubing in her that it looped right back up into her esophagus to her surgery site...which is PAINFUL...sigh...here is what happened right after they took it out...she was exhausted...
Ive written more this year than ever, and received some amazing (and humbling) feedback.
Mid-century chest of drawers in a vibrant retro green lacquered finish. Color could be described as mint, pistachio or teal green. Five drawers total, three white drawers are behind cabinets with sculpted metal pulls. Stands on angled legs. Cool statement piece.
Twenty minutes ago, I got onto Blogger and there it was. My blog. Constructing a simpler life. Just sitting there. I cried. I just wanted to say hello. I never meant to be gone this long. I still had people's stories to tell, interviews, photos, and writing to share. I'm living in Nashville now, finishing an MFA in Creative Writing, but I will get back here. Maybe read the piece I wrote about the Tumbleweed Tiny House workshop in the meantime. It sure is nice to be back.
Anne Clark Our darkness UK
Green / red / yellow pepper, chopped
Q: How to forgive truly?
It's not what we thought, or even hoped. Why couldn't it be a stupid infected in grown hair like I thought? The doctor came in and said that dreaded five letter word, tumor.
-Ozwargs located in the higher floors of Thenton Tower (Cast Blazemore and have good health compared to other caster pets)
And you would look outside,
the Creation of God
“No kidding?” Arnold called back. “That’s terrific! Who would have thought they’d still be here after all this time.”
Yup, unfortunately I”m still taking a break from the blog. I actually did write a lengthy piece a few weeks ago but WordPress accidentally erased it all, which was super discouraging. Anywho, I’ve been business with a lot of other projects and haven’t really been in the frame of mind to get back to blogging about skeptical issues. But I do plan to return at some point in the near future.
Brooklyn Works is located at-
"Hi."
The committee is looking at “potential gaps” when it comes to executive compensation and transitional leaves and will gather best practices in higher education, Beeson said.
Issued to: Craig Whyte, Director, Rangers FC
MY OPINION: SERIOUSLY.
At thankyou.com, there’s a rewards program where you can earn points toward future purchases. What stood out for me here was the Testimonials section, letters written by satisfied customers who bought tires, rented a Cadillac for their Nashville vacation or “finally got that meat slicer I’ve wanted for some time.”
Yowza!
Then I figured out how to make a hero and play the other fractions. (No I don’t play online, I use the hot seat or the single player, simply because I love playing the computer and my boyfriend, so it felt a bit strange for me to have to make a hero…)
I am not sure if it/she ever made any sounds, I am guessing that it/she was mentally communicating with/leading/controlling the zombie-like beings with it/her mind, and it/she look powerful; and I was glad that it/she did not see me.
I am honestly running out of words to write. This layout was completed last week but I was stuck at what to journal. Before I continue, I have to tell you that I was afraid I might not have time to post this entry because I was not able to come up with the journaling. Hence, the journaling on the layout is actually taken from this blog ;)
So, you may remember this post in which I made a vegan banana cream pie. You may also remember that my attempt at a whipped cream-esque topping was an unqualified failure. This was because the coconut milk did not separate/congeal in the fridge like it usually does. I thought I would try again after being invited to a dinner party. Once again, though, the cream did not set in the fridge (has Thai Kitchen changed their coconut milk? What's the deal?). To remedy the situation I took some readers' advice and put some agar into the coconut milk to firm it up. It's a little more complicated than just putting a can into the fridge, but it's not really hard and is more stable at room temperature. I used full fat coconut milk, but I don't see any reason why this would not work with low fat (but that theory has yet to be tested. You might need more agar since there is less fat to firm up in the mixture when it gets cold).
We happened to be there during Happy Hour, 2 for 1 drinks. Very nice.
What type of concealer do you use? Would love some recommendations, or what products I should steer clear of.
* All entries must be the unaided work of the entrant.
I couldn’t give him a blood transfusion because he had already lost a pint of blood. I couldn’t teach him how to read because no one had ever bothered to send him to school before me. I couldn’t help you because you needed help.
Cut 48 small stars (or other shape) from remaining pie crust (re-roll dough as necessary).
First off. Thank you for listening. Thank you for being willing to be vulnerable yourself and share your thoughts. I knew I wasn't alone. I so appreciate your wisdom... many of you shared things I'm still chewing on. Treasuring up and pondering. So good.
Put another way: if you were an employee of the publisher, it would be unfair of them to expect you to write the book and market it. But you're not. You're a sole proprietor. You're ultimately responsible for your book, and everything about it; everyone involved in its journey to publication is effectively a contractor providing their services to you. The publisher is like a consultant. If they say make a trailer, you'd be wise to listen to them. That's how they earn their cut.
I haven’t quite made up my mind about this one.
Ever since I got my ipad, I have been slightly obsessed with it. And when my parents got me a leopard print Steve Madden case for it, it became my favourite fashion accessory: it gets all dressed up and goes everywhere with me! So I totally get why technology accessories are becoming such a fast-growing market. And where there is market growth, there are new brands popping up all the time!
But they’re Republicans so ‘that’s alright’.
so this 'muka buruk' habit came from my brothers.
The only thing I actually managed to take off were my heels haha.
I recently underwent this procedure when the results of the normal echocardiogram were inconclusive. The doctor needed to take a closer look to determine if my symptoms were related to some heart condition. I was a bit apprehensive because I had been told that I would be asked to swallow the endoscope that the doctor would insert in my mouth and then on into my esophagus. Since I sometimes have trouble swallowing under normal conditions I was afraid they wouldn’t be able to get the procedure done.
but this was take on the 28th by someone who’s really good with camera
Make a dressing with the olive oil,the two types of vinegar, sambal, soy sauce, onion, shallot, garlic, and parsley.
A reader who wishes to remain anonymous (rather than Anonymous), writes:
A full-scale Israeli offensive to force a complete overhaul of Indian foreign policy was under way. In the unlikely scenario of it happening, such an event would be a geopolitical earthquake. India’s reliance on oil producers who are firmly in the U.S. camp would be dangerously high. There would be other consequences in the short run. An audacious attack by Israel on Iran, with or without U.S. support, could be nearer, and so would the prospects of a wider Middle East conflict. For these reasons, India now stands between the present and the worst case scenario.
Today, I have had a jaw-breaking experience. I hate to use this word -literally- but it was literally that. At a time I should have been enjoying a leisurely day off work, I found myself prone where I stayed for 1 1/2 hours. With my mouth open, obviously. Sorry, did I say I went to the dentist? I went to the dentist this morning for a root canal.
Many of you who are searching for information about the aforementioned organization may find the following links interesting:
Horses, being dumb animals (Muse: let’s not go there…!), tend to get more sympathy than authors. But sanctuaries exist even for us. The Royal Literary Fund awards grants to writers in need, and also places authors in Universities all over the UK under their excellent Fellowship scheme. So if you know an author who is suffering, point them in the right direction. A bit of kindness and care can go a long way.
Brauerei Spezial Spezial Rauchbier Lager
Why the little things make us and how long it takes us
That he has a daughter now who will never be afraid to imagine something else or some place else.
Maggie Rodriguez of The Early Show interviews Amgela Suleman the grandmother of the octuplets. Dr. Michael Kamrava, of the West Coast IVF Clinic, performed the in-vitro fertilization that led to Nadya getting pregnant with the octuplets.
Daniel Stearns's CD, Golden Town (2011 spectropol records) has been played with some intensity in my studio for a few months now. People who know me or read this blog know that I don't take recordings lightly, sometimes taking great lengths to avoid the medium, but Golden Town is such a striking (at turns alien, challenging, then almost familiar, almost easy) listening experience, and one made very much for the recorded media, that I've wanted to share some words about it, but it is precisely this knot of vision/sound/word problems that has kept me back.
to talk to him via computer and have him be so close
This was wrong.
New Glarus Brewing Company Crack'd Wheat
The Sidney Crosby Card Show
Richard C. Cottrell,
One second he was pushing a ball down a lane, the next he was rolling around on the floor shouting ‘I don’t want to play bowling!!’ and ‘I don’t love you Mummy!’ (Geez! Where did that come from?!). This went on for a few seconds longer than it should of, mostly because I was holding a baby at the time and had to put her down before I could properly deal with this mess.
Other Person: That's impossible! What if they want to go to the moon in a spaceship? I can't get my kids what they want every time they ask! I'd be broke. Here's why I have a problem with this kind of thinking: It's focused on the impossibilities, the exceptions, the singularities. It's focused on what we can't do. How often do our children want things that are truly impossible to get? More importantly, how often do our children want things that are possible, and we brush them off because we have to teach them they can't always get what they want.
“If you realize that you have enough, you are truly rich.”
So, here it is. My experiment. In the coming weeks I will post the first 2 or 3 chapters of my novel in plain text on this blog as well as a link to download the audio versions of these chapters. I plan on including music in the audio versions. Some of my instrumental music to start with and then possibly branching out to other groups or artists who would like to join forces with me. I will continue to do this for the entire 4th draft of my novel, cover to cover. Some things will likely change from time to time, but we will see how it goes.
So far it has been a wonderful and inspiring trip. We have been having a great time and learning a lot about the Japanese culture. Tomorrow we are headed to our host family experience and our next high school visit. Look for more blogs soon.
Each different skin type will react differently to the various types of cosmetics. Even if a particular brand works for your eye shadow, the same brand may not work for lipstick. This is because the skin type on your eyelids may be very different from the skin type on your lips. When you are choosing cosmetics such as foundation, for example, avoid drying cosmetics or cosmetics that cause your skin to break out. Unfortunately, you may have to try several products in order to determine those that work on your skin consistently. Another issue which must be considered is that your skin may build up a reaction to a particular cosmetic which did not previously cause a skin irritation, so you may be forced to find an alternative to a tried and true brand which worked well in the past. Skin characteristics may change significantly over a lifetime as well, forcing a change in the type of cosmetics which you select.
Goodnight Dredlings!
Spellbinders "Paisley" impressionability embossing folder- 5.00 BRAND NEW
That's all from me today, I hope you have a good day, whatever you are doing and that the weather is kind to you. Thankyou so much for visiting my blog today and for any comments you may leave for me, I really appreciate them so much - and see you again very soon,
‘As soon as the enemy’s roundshot came hopping along, we simply did the polite – opened out and allowed them to pass on – there is nothing lost by politeness, even on a battlefield. As we kept advancing we had to move our pins to get out of their way; and presently they began to pitch their shot and shell right amongst us and our men began to fall. I know that I felt horribly sick…’
Merit Points = Experience Points
COOKING CLASS:
"Are you embarassed or self-conscious about something?" I prompted her. "Kind of, I guess," she admitted. Another thing that helped me put all this together was when we had a portrait made in March with her brother and her baby cousin. They were all wearing jeans and white shirts. Baby Paige was barefoot, so we could see those adorable baby toes. I suggested that Amanda and Kyle take off their shoes. Amanda refused (politely and respectfully, of course), because "I don't like the way my feet look with no shoes."
Once the paper is stamped, I then took each individual solid and inked the colors! I will definitely be making more of my own paper with this set! It would be wonderful to sit down and do a few sheets of Whisper White CS with the outlines and fill in with color when you were ready for it! Talk about a great use of the Clear Blocks and the stamp sets!
Where are you feeling vulnerable…stressed…in a dark valley?
Jesus is clear in so many ways on this subject. He said to lend and expect nothing in return, told the rich man that if he wanted to be perfect to sell everything he has and give to the poor, and spoke of the Pharisee who gave money with great show and pomp for everyone to see versus the widow who gave only two mites, everything she had. Jesus said "Do not store up for yourselves treasures on earth, where moth and rust destroy, and where thieves break in and steal. But store up for yourselves treasures in heaven, where moth and rust do not destroy, and where thieves do not break in and steal. For where your treasure is, there your heart will be also. (Mathew 6:19-22)
Good Sawing!
The Stranger Than Fiction track is a particular favourite, such a pity they were only to release just one single. Other standouts for many will be the Cabs produced You're Without Sound which was mixed from the original Fragments tape session at Western Works, and Martin Hannett's dark production on Section 25's After Image (still a live standard up until Larry Cassidy's recent passing).
I added 3 jingle bells inside the head (well surrounded by batting and tightly sewn in), so it makes a soft jingly sound that's not annoying. (The not-annoying part is very important to this migraine-prone mama!) I'm not thrilled with the placement of the handle, so I may still rip that out and resew it. We'll see. I'm pretty tired of sewing at this point, so I may just leave it.
Stir together sour cream and just enough milk to get a thick pourable consistency.
Well, there hasn't exactly been a summer here in Ireland, but I've finished my free giveaway of PERIL on Smashwords. If you downloaded it then I hope you enjoy the trials and tribulations of Ger Mayes. All reviews gratefully received - the good, the bad and the ugly.
Compared to images with an unambiguous subject, abstract images can be more difficult for many people (perhaps most people) to appreciate and understand. One goal may be to find a middle ground where allusion to a subject adds substance and depth that complements the simpler pleasures of line and color.
we are maybe almost laughing
He had a knack for capturing rats and frogs, which he sold to help pay for college, which he never quite finished - too busy fur trading on the Labrador Coast and engaging in his hobby of harpooning whales.
So tomorrow he moves again, ready or not. This disease is intellectually fascinating and utterly heartbreaking. I can honestly say that given a choice, I would have preferred to remain ignorant of this particular knowledge.
The kids loved it. Being with gammy and papa is the best, especially when gammy takes you shopping and gives you your first real mani/pedi.
・ Quick-Shift Focus system for instant switching to manual-focus operation, after the subject is captured in focus by the AF system
But the larger point is this: when someone looks different, or when someone looks like your idea of a “terrorist,” you readily argue that it is okay to stereotype them.
As debt peaks, Cull talks of asset sales
Try and reach it if you can.
Follow-up on the axe discovery (Feb 10th)
Lior
He takes care of me.
So the trip to Venal was short… or not too long in any case. Any fleet form up is like herding cats at times. There is that first 15-30 minutes of people joining late, wanted to know where the fleet is, wanting to know if they can catch up. And then there are the rest of us who just want to go go go and get to the destination and what exactly is the destination please and what are we going to do when we get there can we jump already or is the gate red and if it is do I have long enough to run to the store and buy some more beer?
I have also written my book because I am not a defeatist. The West is able to defeat totalitarian Islam just as it defeated Nazism and Communism in the past.
Look how gorge they are on my mantel!
and so made the foundation of his work,
Meanwhile Nestle has invested lots into 'shared value', and Wal-Mart has switched in its reporting from ‘global sustainability’ to ‘global responsibility’ in 2011. Nike, meanwhile, prefers 'sustainable innovation'.
The B side “Confined to Memory” presents a considerably more restrained face of the band, although the vocal dynamics are astounding. It’s a mournfully beautiful piece of reflections on a dead (or possibly dying?) relationship. I suspect most of us have been there at some stage or another and know that empty feeling of wondering what the aftermath will be like and what will remain. It’s a magnificent break-up song, but I’d certainly be inclined to leave it until well after said break up.
As my Starbucks habit continued to grow more and more disturbing, my drinks get more and more complicated. At first, it was just an Americano—probably the healthiest thing on the list at 10 wholesome coffee calories. Then, it was a sugar-free-vanilla-Americano. Then, I discovered soy lattes. I can’t really drink milk, it kills me, which means I can’t ever get their trendy “skinny latte” and prance around in big sunglasses pretending I’m not drinking a worthless 200 calories because it says “skinny” in the name.
Does that seem to be a lot of “legwork” to cover when you are in search of the best vet? It might very well be. However, taking a few extra steps to know about the veterinarians in your vicinity is worth the time commitment. (Your family pet will appreciate all of the extra effort too) Thankfully, the overwhelming majority of veterinarians within the profession seek to provide the most stellar service possible. Your pet would probably be in great hands no matter which particular veterinarian you choose.
As much as it would be nice to go back to the days when people were free to criss-cross the world without such inconveniences and indignities, this just isn’t going to happen. So since we can’t go back to a zero passport world, the next best solution is a multiple passport world.
Having a post- Austin-Beer-Week-bummer day. Never fear, South Austin Brewing is stepping up to alleviate your blues. From Jordan:
Once a society embraces magical thinking and comes to believe that it can grow its economy through unlimited spending on a welfare state and cargo cult infrastructure investments, it needs scapegoats to throw to the mob when things don't go well. The scapegoats are invariably the members of the hated groups who continue to persevere, who are outsiders and who aren't satisfied to sink down with the rest of the culture.
In Bataan, province of the Philippines (1942)
I’m so excited about this post and the pairing up of Lawn Fawn and May Arts. I just LOVE ribbon, and when we got the chance to do this with May Arts, I was so excited.
ANC Youth League President Julius Malema, right, addresses a crowd outside a Johannesburg court in April. Malema denied that singing the anti-apartheid struggle song, "Shoot the farmer," incited violence against whites. He is now calling for seizing land from whites to redistribute to blacks. (Alexander Joe, AFP/Getty Images / June 17, 2011)
It took a ton of inner work to shed the mask of approval-seeking. I can taste the anxiety of rejection in my mouth, like it was yesterday. When someone didn't like me, I was wrought with questioning. Why? WHY? (which on the flip-side is also very self-absorbed - as if other people's choices always have something to do with us).
Well, as it turns out, I had to call the police to get into my own house. Two awesome lady cops showed up and helped me get in and get some clothes and personal items. It was soooooo awesome! One of the lady cops, right in front of my wasband said, "You can do sooooo much better!". Thanks ladies for helping me out! Then I was whining that the SOB had thrown the cat out and she was missing and they have laws that protect animals from abusive spouses, blah, blah, blah, and as we are having this conversation, she says "You mean that cat?" And here come Kiki right up to me! I was sooooo happy. Happy that Mr. Mooney would now have his best friend back.
It was the first day of classes, and as all college cliché movies bean with, there was that one guy that had every single female in the class drooling over their laptops. It was pathetic. Needless to say, that was the route that Leigh took. She wouldn’t go as far as to say that he was the most handsome guy she’d ever seen, nor that he was somehow linked to a mythological god. No. These types of statements just wouldn’t seem right; they were superfluous. Leigh needed to be practical and realistic on her opinion of others. Still though, Christian made her feel like a pre-pubescent girl who couldn’t talk properly and believed that she would be with Justin Bieber forever and ever. It was that bad.
Every couple of days.
41. I don't like it when we skip spring and go straight into summer.
According to the U.S. Census, there is only one Barack Obama - but 27 Social Security numbers and over 80 aliases.
Nita
I haven't bought yellow lipstick yet but that is next on my list.
I really hope that you do too. Maybe, we might just end up saving the world. Just like Superman.
Thompson traded back up into round 2 to nab the corner he was really high on in the second best ball hawk in this draft, Casey Hayward from Vanderbilt. Casey Hayward has the type of instincts and tools needed to translate into a very good starting defensive back in the NFL. A three-year starter for the Commodores with 37 career starts, Hayward offers fantastic experience, having significant playing time against the top wide receivers in the country in the SEC. One of the most productive players in this year’s draft, Casey’s statistics at Vanderbilt were phenomenal, recording 198 tackles, 18 tackles for loss, 31 pass breakups, and 15 interceptions throughout his career in Nashville; his most productive season came as a senior in 2011 when he tallied 62 tackles, 7.5 tackles for loss, 10 pass breakups, and seven interceptions (one returned for a touchdown). One of the most instinctive players at the cornerback position in 2011, Casey has rare ball-hawking skills with the type of opportunistic mentality that you simply can’t teach. One statistic that I look closely at with defensive backs is passes defended, which shows how a player reads action in front of him, how instinctive he is to react on what he reads, and how effective he is at making a play on the ball. Any player that produces over 30 passes defended during their career tends to be a player that I have a high opinion of; Casey produced 46 during his career. Owning an ideal frame for the position with a tall, lean frame, Hayward is a natural, fluid athlete with very quick feet as well as the quickness and agility needed to turn and run on a dime; he’s a smooth player in transition who opens up very well and is capable of covering ground very quickly with great range. Casey spent the majority of his time at Vanderbilt playing in zone coverage, dropping back in a Cover-3 or Cover-4 scheme and effectively closing down either a third or a quarter of the field. Whenever the ball was thrown in his direction, he accelerated and closed very quickly, crashing down on the receiver either to intercept the ball, deflect it away, or tackle the receiver low for an open field tackle. Hayward’s ball skills are among the best in this year’s draft, displaying a rare ability to drop back, read the quarterback’s eyes, before seeking out the ball with outstanding anticipation and awareness. Between his fluid ability to turn and run, range to cover ground quickly, and his terrific ball skills and anticipation, I could very easily see him being considered for a move to free safety in the NFL.
Realizing the Work Problem - God gave us work and yet He gave us values – Sabbath means to STOP. Balancing our life so that we don’t shape our life, but we shape work.
At the end of the day, things are bad in Pakistan. Talking about the poetry of Faaiz or the informal economy is not fooling anyone. The level of discussion was poor from the representatives of Pakistan. They were speaking as if the audience was a bunch of rednecks who can’t separate Pakistan from Yemen. That was not the case. The World Bank crowd is trained at identifying bullshit from corrupt nations so that they don’t waste their funding. Hafeez Sheikh in particular gave no reason for anyone to believe things are brighter in Pakistan. The approach, in my view, should have been to recognize the trials facing the country and chart out a plan to tackle them. Instead the focus was on trying to ignore that and point out a few rosy facts about Pakistan. That is the problem with the PPP government. Ask anybody, literally anybody, what they think about their performance in office and without hesitation they will tell you it is utterly awful. However, everyone in the PPP seems to think they have done a damn good job. Sure, they did a few good things, but just about every leadership system in Pakistan minus Zia has done something positive in 4 years of power. If the takeaway is that they are better than Zia, then we are doomed.
After years spent unearthing documents in dusty basements, courthouses, libraries, and of course, the Green-Wood archives, Feldman emerged with Call Me Daddy, which recounts the story of millionaire real estate mogul Edward West Browning, a man whose salacious antics frequently graced the sensational front pages in 1920s New York.
of matching & frilly little dresses....sniff sniff.
Oh boy, I am really channeling my girly girl side lately! How girly is this fun dress form birthday card??!! I made this card for a friend's 13th birthday. The dress form stamp is from Stampendous. The Oval is from Endless Creations.
I’m still in my pjs due to bubble juice extraction is a messy, messy job.
Gabrielle Giffords is holding her own today, thankfully. She is the only victime left in critical condition. As serious as her wound is, I imagine it will be a couple weeks. I really do hope she pulls through.
Back together with me
I would like to think that the reporter was having a bad day, but if I were the editor (and the reporter's immediate "boss") of this paper, I would be watching my back. If I were the fat cat owner sitting back, smoking my big fat "ceegahrs," and plotting how to shut down a small local paper, I might chuckle and give myself a pat on the back for hiring these guys in the first place.
Hello to all the beautiful people reading this blog! There is at least one person that wishes they could be you right now-so be fabulous today!
strike (strk)
PLUS remember with each stamp you purchase you will get a bonus badge! Collect 5 bonus badges to earn
'Unaware' of high prices
Doesn’t it just sum him up? All twenty-two years of him, from these early, blunt Keystone days to the almost post-comic icon he became for United Artists. Always odd, always outside, and always there: drawing our eyes from the centre of life to the periphery.
"Your character shouts so loudly in my ears I can't hear what you say." Emerson
Or am I merely overlaying one romantic cinematic vision on top of another? As a single cinephile with traces of hopeless romanticism in his soul, I have a tendency to do that...especially on Valentine's Day.
Is the Archbishop in despair or does he really just not care?
The room inspiration - designed by Jonathan Adler:
They say oh it is in this doing this
It looks a bit like Kif from Futurama but that's not going to mess with anybody's head. We need a narrow-headed figure with religious or sexual connotations. Guan Yin should fit the bill - her depictions are often very attenuated. (We suspect it started out as a pragmatic solution to fitting a figure into an ivory tusk and then became part of her iconography.)
Puppet Man
4And they shall see his face; and his name shall be in their foreheads.
And unfortunately for Pell, and his trusting belief in the sanctity and goodness of the (alleged) holy father, it’s starting to look very much as though the smoking gun linking Benedict directly to cover ups has appeared: Warned About Abuse, Vatican Failed to Defrock Priest.
When I am the most at peace?
3. Artists plae objects in still-life paintings very carefully. If any object were removed would the painting still be balanced?
Not much has been happening for the past month. It’s been pretty slow on the book front. I’ve managed to get some more writing done on The Starchild–adding new material for the book and getting a few chapters done in the process.
Thanks to Check Out My Cards, I have finally finished what I think is the coolest insert set ever. I now have all 18 Lumber Yard inserts from 2002 Upper Deck 40-Man.
Two weeks!
No. 12 on my beauty top 20 is a miracle worker in a little green tub! Origin’s Brighter By Nature High-P0tency Brightening Peel with Fruit Acids
Inevitable, some pervert has found this page looking for something else entirely. I’m sorry for those of you that fit into this category, but the rest of this posting is going to let you down.
* A green-gilt sword
After talking to Jo, she recommended I change up a few things for the colder climate. Starting with my cleanser- switch to Special Cleansing Gel. It is gentle and foamy and frothy, plus helps prevent clogged pores and breakouts. That's an added bonus, right?
I have gone on a fabric spree at the garment district in NYC
cloak or mantles (A short (hip- or thigh-length) cape) or Mantelets — worn in the evening, often as part of an ensemble for the opera. Short cloaks with upstanding collars would also be worn for a theatrical evening out
Me: "*sneaking suspicion I'm dealing with a total fucking moron* Okay, let's look at your Cable Company receiver. What lights do you see?"
"The pain that is yet to come can be avoided." The pain of the past is done, cannot be changed. The pain of the present we must experience. But the pain that is to come...we can change that. This is how the yoga instructor, Sarah Deming, explained it in our vinyasa class last night.
And I’ll tell you why.
I am fighting this MS episode with everything I have and can. The Neuro thinks I am managing pretty well considering all the stress I live with.. It looks like I might come out of this one with minimal damage..
Andreas Bulow / Culture and Revolution in Venezuela / 131
Furthermore, I have come to realize that:
New Magnet sign...add photos cards and more to this sign..available options are limitless.
Makes one Povitica loaf
Mum was telling me that they took a day out to the Yorvik viking festival not so long ago, and it was much admired by some Regia Anglorum types in the pub, at which I was slightly bemused, as I’d have thought pointing and laughing would have been a more appropriate response.
Jake makes it back to his hometown, and suddenly, the black sheep is the brave leader that no one realized he could be, beneath the criminal mischief and running away from everyone he ever knew and all that. Need to hide from fallout? Jake’ll hide you safely in a mine, even if he has to blow up the entrance to seal you in from the elements. Yeah, Skeet is bad-ass.
- This is quickly followed by, “200 dead? Damn, I had 250 in the pool.”
Whisk whipping cream until nice and thick and refrigerate until needed.
I can show you all the very things that you don’t want to see,
We ripped out the carpet and re-finished the floors and my parents put up a small crown molding. The only mirror left is the one on the closet door, which is perfect! Although it is tinted so it is kind of dark.
After Ali and Hassan leave, Baba and Amir escape from Afghanistan when Russia invades. The story then follows Amir’s life in America with his father, as he meets his wife, and watches his father die from cancer.
So, yes: When people in a marginalized group see yet another creative work that speaks only to people of privilege, they have every right to dismiss that work, regardless of how many privileged people insist that the work is somehow objectively the pinnacle of awesome. And they most certainly have a right to complain when that work is considered some sort of cultural groundbreaker when it is anything but.
P.P.S. – Mondo’s outfit during the “After the Runway” segment was perhaps the most hideous thing he’s worn yet. Way to prove your taste level is in the crapper. And I won’t be looking at Marie Claire ever again.
The station was locally owned for a long time by Beaverkettle (the Vodrey family), and was sold to the NextMedia chain in 2000.
Winner: School Administrators Tell Victoria to Leave Her Secret At Home
They're a sweet reminder... each April...
Here’s what we see.
“We opted for the short one, natch.
4 tbs black soy sauce
Oh baby I know you don't mean to be such a whore
My second Project is a Birthday Cake from using a Tea Light Candle.
What motivates you?
Probable cause is a level of reasonable belief, based on facts that can be articulated, that is required to sue a person in civil court or to arrest and prosecute a person in criminal court. Before a person can be sued or arrested and prosecuted, the civil plaintiff or police and prosecutor must possess enough facts that would lead a reasonable person to believe that the claim or charge is true.
I want to be helpful, real, and honest. Am I over-thinking this? YES. Might I write this and all of it fall on zero ears anyway? MAYBE. But what if it doesn’t?
Rating: 5/10 Atkins
but don't worry, I didn't get a fright. I approached it calmly and said, "why hello snow. you may have sneaked up on me, but we can still be friends."
In conclusion I understand public concern, it’s needed, a big decision like this should be handled with the up most care. It’s in the hands of the government to do it right.
Law #7: Encrypted data is only as secure as the decryption key
Magan Rodriguez
Suppose I own and manage a firm of printers. I don't run it as an explicitly 'Christian' printers' shop, but generally print most business that comes to me. One day, inexplicably, the Jehovah's Witnesses come knocking on my door. Not so much to convert me as because they want some work doing: a tract printing off. It's pretty stiff stuff, attacking the doctrine of the Trinity and claiming that mainstream Christians a polytheists who believe in false gods.
Spain 15%
I got an email from my son’s teacher today…and…uhhhh…it wasn’t good news.
“If you really have to,” she said below, and opened and took my cock between her lips and gave me the inside of her mouth, soft, wet, sweet to the senses.
I can't wait to get to play again! And this will be your chance to buy Better Than Wages on VINYL and American Apparel wife-beaters and boyfriend-beaters with the coolest logo – summer is coming, you know.
The national beverage enjoyed by Argentineans and other South Americans. It is best described as a particular type of tea drank in a particular manner.
Wreck of the Edmond Fitzgerald....Gordon Lightfoot
Surely we were all taught this when we were young?
I have a laundry list 3 pages long of excuses as to why I have been missing from my blog for almost a month, but none of them are worth a hoot! I apologize for my absence and promise to keep up better! LOL
I haven’t shopped in LUSH since I was 13, (8 years ago!) the reasons for this being 1) living nowhere near a LUSH store and 2) never really feeling the need to buy freshly made products or responsibility sourced ingredients.
I have to admit, I bawled my eyes out on the plane ride back from New York this time around. Alone in the dark at 3AM. For exactly 76 minutes. I thought about my family and cried. I thought about my friends and cried. I thought about all the stoops in Brooklyn and Queens I sat on and cried. I thought about the concert I gave there, the stage banter in English flowing effortlessly from my mouth and an entire room laughing at all of my jokes.
and heaven knows, that was one weird day
Second, although the manager had no guilty feelings, he managed to make his abused victim feel inadequate by repeating “It is Ok” (right after his violent emotional outburst against the person who disagreed with him). Basically, he made the victim feel that the victim’s normal emotional reaction to the abuse was overreacting. As the result, the victim felt guilty.
The questions run out here, actually, so I've added thirteen of my own.
Delectables is an exquisite, guilt-free chocolate. Delectables are not only decadent, they're also infused with flavonoid antioxidants—providing nutrition in a delightfully silky chocolate indulgence.
When I was inside the house, looking out, I felt cradled by a forest of apricot, quince, pear, apple, black walnut, oak, honeysuckle, roses by the dozens, blackberries, orange trumpet flowers, ivy, and purple flowers of Vinca.
down the smooth arch of her back
His very favorite thing was to go fishing with the Big Guy. Buster took his fishing very seriously. Folsom Lake was his lake; he was completely at home on the bass boat; and his hysterical yapping let everyone know that the fish were biting. As soon as a fish appeared at the end of the line, Buster would launch himself into the water and try to retrieve it. He knew the Big Guy would reel it in, but he wasn’t taking any chances!
Preheat the oven to 170°C/gas 3. Put the butter and the dark chocolate in a heatproof bowl over a saucepan of simmering water (do not let the base of the bowl touch the water). Leave until melted and smooth.
But the mask I wear,
In the meantime, if you'd like to see what's been turning my crank for the past month, let me introduce you to a Russian telenovela series--already ten years old--which I discovered on You Tube and have been watching obsessively ever since.
Since as far back as I can remember, I’ve considered myself a feminist. I have a baby photo of me wearing a Ms. t-shirt. I was raised from about age 2 on by my single mom, and she always instilled in me a sense of pride in being a woman and taught me that I could do anything I wanted to, supporting me through countless incarnations, whether that meant going off to play chess at age 15 in Brazil or doing civil disobedience in Hegins, Pennsylvania by running out on a field in front of scary, racist hunters and freeing some pigeons.
Anyone in NZ can now walk into any ASB and ask to donate to Paul and they will have the bank details or see the notes section here for bank transfer details.
It wasn’t just boys. Girls (housed in separate all-women Borstals) were taught to cook, sew, iron and clean, and learned basic farming skills, flower arranging and nursing. They let off steam with netball matches, group exercise classes, dancing and ping-pong.
I return to Holland (and Astrid!) on Friday morning, 8 July, and plan to post again here the following Monday. Till then, enjoy your 4th of July holiday if you celebrate it!
Tens of thousands of refugees in Niger, Chad, and the countries of North Africa, as well as some in Europe. Further strain on food-insecure communities and governments with limited resources. Exacerbation of anti-Washington sentiments in communities far beyond the proverbial “Arab street” – many people I know in Kano, for example, strongly disagreed with NATO’s decision to intervene. Economic damage stemming from the loss of remittances from workers in Libya to communities south of the Sahara. Diplomatic struggles over the fate of Qadhafi’s lieutenants and family members. Fears that ethnic violence in southeastern Libya will spread to Chad and Sudan. Weapons on the loose. And war in Mali.
I felt more alert now, and then I noticed a sound. There was a small growling coming from outside. I dropped the bucket back down the well and winced as it sploshed loudly into the water below, (guess it did have a bottom after all).
LM for Ibizarre is below for your shopping convenience-
Admission: 1000 IKR (1 day) or 2500 IKR (3 days)
Can you see how your sales would absolutely explode if you were able to do this? The good news is that lots of salespeople are already doing it with great success, and you can too.
But the fact is, malaria kills disproportionate numbers of the economically active, and as Africa drags itself up by its bootstraps, it is these people it needs. The death of these people has been in part responsible of the economic blight, making the DDT ban all the more tragic.
QUOTES ABOUT SMILES
1) Bring butter to room temperature.
Close lap top.
Second, the issue of bias – Juan Williams made an inflammatory statement. I appreciate the well-reasoned comments by many who point out that unless we discuss our fears we cannot overcome them. In this case, however, even if that had been Williams’ intent, it was not his outcome. The phrase in his comments that sunk him was “they are identifying themselves first and foremost as Muslims”. With that statement, Williams engaged in profiling, a practice he himself has condemned, saying, “Common sense becomes racism when skin color becomes a formula for figuring out who is a danger to me.” Yes, Williams artlessly backpedalled after the fact, acknowledging that he knows he shouldn’t feel that way and wanted to make a point. But this is a man who makes his living with words. If he cannot choose them carefully, he demonstrates that he cannot do his job.
Rarely has there been a band that has disappointed me. There have been bad albums, poor career choices, and “selling out”, but I’m a forgiving listener, and I hand out pardons where they are deserved. But now, someone has gone too far.
I know when I first started reading stories at the EMCSA, it would be in 2000, soon after I got a computer, and typed robot stories into Google, lol!
DEAR BENNY: I have heard the concept “business judgment rule.” Can you explain? –Sam
Then all the talk started & I decided that this was a bandwagon I wouldn't mind being on.
- leaves red marks
Confound the bitter queen
I'm going to be productive this christmas before uni starts. Like perhaps keep a little skecthbook or take a photograph a day... something constructive, instead of eating turkey all the time and watching the Harry Potter film re-run on itv.
*SUSPIRIA – Radio Spot
To shrive themself the old, the young, the great and small.
With so many fun and affordable options, I think we'll have a difficult time deciding what to purchase with the discount. These preppy pink and green wine glasses are only $18 each (link HERE). Wouldn't this make a perfect hostess gift? A set of these would go a long way towards getting you invited to the party again, that's for sure.
Hey--y'all wouldn't happen to know where there's a local beer store that has a few bottles of DR 11 squirreled away for sale, would you?
･Galaxy S
I’m gonna find myself a better way
Here again is a taster of the sections addressed, such as all kinds of sauces, pickles, jams etc, and meat; fish dairy and cakes; Cleaning cosmetics; drinks and tonics are there for the investment of a little time.
Ahh, and you’re looking real sweet!
“Meanwhile he’s been off and drinking with his other friends, lying to me the entire time, no. No. Not even lying because he can’t bring himself to send me a text and tell me the truth or even a socially convenient lie because apparently I’m not worth that effort. But hey, who in their right minds would think that I am worth that effort?”
Part of the hesitancy is likely related to a lack of understanding about what evangelism really is. Dever gives us five things that evangelism IS NOT:
Yup, you read right. There will be more jansta eggis. Wait, did you say eggis? As in plural? As in more than one?
*Took her first gymnastic class (and LOVED LOVED LOVED it!)
To participate, please:
As your story evolves, you'll be evolving, too...
There was however some disappointment for the British team as the mens sprint team of Ross Edgar, Jason Kenny and Sir Chris Hoy missed out on a final place in the qualifying session, Germany went on to beat France for gold in the evening, as Gret Britain defeated Australia to claim the Bronze Medal. Sir Chris commented on the event by saying “The wall of noise when you’re on the track is unbelievable.
Yep. That’s right. I’m talking boba here.
I simply inked and layered, then added the sentiment.
Failure 1) Seeds rolled around
and God’s Sovereignty seems like a foe
Once people see you as a drunk, a liability and a source of amusement – people who are not your friends and don’t have your best interests at heart – it is very difficult to change this perception.
Workbox/File 4:Science worksheet
I was notified by that i was nominated for versatile blogger award, i just started blogging just 2 months ago and i have received many awards. i must thank boomie so much! you can check out her site, its really cool. wwww.boomiebol.wordpress.com
He began to run out of breath and begged me to slow down, but I strode on upwards. I knew I had to rid myself of this man, and all he represented.
I have a trunk that is full of summer items that can probably be removed.
04 On The Sunny Side Of The Street (Fields, McHugh) 5:12
I will say that taking the three private lessons made a HUGE difference. You CANNOT CANNOT get the proper Pilates stuff from a DVD without first knowing what you are going for. It's been challenging for me because I'm great at powering through stuff but not so great at using only one specific muscle. Doing a sit up has a whole new meaning now for me. Because I have to isolate my transverse abs and pull up from only that muscle, sit ups take a long time. To someone watching, it must look like I'm just laying on the floor making weird faces and occasionally lifting my head. But I'm working HARD. And seeing results, even if they are small. Three weeks ago, I couldn't lift my head off the floor without torquing my entire body. Now I can use just my transverse abs and my head can float off the floor. Amazing.
This is all the more reason to replicate the results with subjects from another population, preferably one with as little ethnic substructure as possible.
For more info about this giveaway, just click on the banner located on my sidebar.
The House Oversight and Government Reform Committee has scheduled a hearing Thursday on 10 vacancies, including seven that have lasted longer than a year.
That is why each restrictive measure that has been implemented and demanded since 2007 has been done at an obscene pace.
Watching: The Adjustment Bureau, new season of How I met Your Mother and New Girl.
(I forgot to mention the other side to The Big Bang, where there were tiny particles of matter that expanded in that… :/ Recently I was informed that String Theory makes The Big Bang possible. I can’t clarify that though because I don’t have an understanding of the science behind it).
The dear water and your dear plants have been distorted in ways so that many do not honor the water and the plants, but so that you all rather use these plants in your own ways and for your own gains. Of course, it was indeed agreed upon by humanity, the animals and the elements that at certain points along the lower dimensional experience and indeed, nearly during the entire lower dimensional experience, humanity would need to utilize the gifts given by plants, by water, by animals and so many other Life forms for humanities own gain an advancement.
Just as I put the finishing touches on my previous post regarding the Alberta election campaign, a series of polls came out showing that the Wildrose Party had moved from being a strong second place challenger to the incumbent Progressive Conservatives (PCs) to being tied with them or even ahead. As the first week of the Alberta election campaign unfolds, we see that a full-fledged race between the PCs and Wildrose has emerged. The new polls by Campaign Research and Forum Research account for the changes to my Alberta election prediction, the state of which is above.
28. Spotted Frostsaber – 1 gold + Exalted with Darnassus
In truth, I wouldn’t want to live on a planet where gorillas were the preponderant species. The good thing about being a gorilla on Earth is that you stand out from the crowd, by which I mean the great swarming mass of sweaty humans. Crowds of gorillas simply do not exist. All I had to do to become the talk of the town was join a circus and kick a few clowns in the arse. Humans, by contrast, have to take part in talent shows or have sex with celebrities if they want to get noticed.
Birdy - Skinny Love
Its late, I need to sleep and yet I cannot shed my yearning. So many visions are crowding my head… I want his hands on me
Having discovered the refreshing local aperitif Txakoli (a popular tipple in Pintxo bars) the day before, we ordered two glasses and sat back to admire the surrounding greenery and breathe in the sweet country air. The remote location is appropriately idyllic, a reflection of the emphasis on nature in Andoni Luis Aduriz’s ‘techno-emotional’ cuisine that utilises scientific techniques to accentuate, but not overshadow, each season’s bounty.
The movie ended with Judah crying. Spoiler Alert: The firefly, Ray, gets squashed by the voodoo doctor. Judah began to weep. "Now he can't fly anymore, Mama." It took a while for the boy to compose himself and see that Ray got to be with Evangeline, his true love. Yeesh. Forget ever taking the kid to the theater without a change of clothes and a box of tissues. The kid has a tender heart. Poor guy.
But then Mike was there with me every single step of the way, reassuring me. He reminded me that it was hot, other people in the race were struggling too, and this course was brutal. He told me to stop looking at my watch, forget about the time, and remember that simply finishing a marathon is a feat in itself, not matter how you get there. I really and sincerely thought about quitting, but something inside me just wouldn’t allow it. I did not come this far to give up. As we approached mile marker 21, Mike offered to stay with me for the rest of the race, but I told him no. I needed to finish this journey on my own. We stopped for a moment, he kissed me on the forehead and said, “No matter what happens, I love you and I am so proud of you. I’ll see you at the finish line.” And that was all I needed.
Become followers of our blog today and keep up with the growth of our program. Follow our students as they chronicle their experiences by blogging here on our site. Hear first accounts of what they are learning on an individual, group, and community level as they prepare to engage in this life changing and transformational opportunity.
A month later, the limp was back, but much worse. Another trip to the vet. This time radiographs were taken, although nothing abnormal appeared. It was determined that his shoulder area was extremely tender and painful to the touch, so a diagnosis of tendonitis was made. He received a cortisone shot, instructions to rest as much as possible and a two-week regimen of pain pills to begin two weeks after the appointment.
Alysha Gale is a member of a family capable of changing the world with the charms they cast. Then she receives word that she's inherited her grandmother's junk shop in Calgary, only to discover upon arriving that she'll be serving the fey community. And when Alysha learns just how much trouble is brewing in Calgary, even calling in the family to help may not be enough to save
Don Blankenship
So – that’s what I am doing right at the moment. Editing. Yippeee! And it’s a lovely way to ease myself back into the game as well.
My past inclinations to run, sabotage, victimized myself or manipulate have disappeared from my bag of tricks. I don’t even WANT him to love me. I simply have to accept it. Raw, simple, genuine, uncontingent, not even offered, just there for the taking, LOVE. And somehow, I’m functioning, in the stillness of it all.
Hi Mae! I just LOVE your stage name! Mae West is most definitely one of my idols, and you DO have strikingly similar features. How lovely!
I'd had an ambition to become an illustrator since I was about thirteen, so I studied illustration at college (Anglia Ruskin in Cambridge, or CCAT as it was known then). Sadly the only effect that had was to completely destroy my confidence, so I went off and worked in a bookshop for about ten years before I summoned up the nerve to start looking for illustration work.
Here are a few examples:
* Speech Bubbles
Louise Hay recommended that you don’t break your habits as when you break something, there are peaces everywhere. So dissolve instead if you want it to disappear.
Being a pupil of international studies (and my friend majored in history), I was peppered with lectures about international organizations. But when I was in college, I didn’t really give much attention to it, since I believe that it’s just some type of requirement for some of my courses. But after some time, I started to give serious thinking about this and realized some points that supported my belief that the UN in particular should be abolished.
I would be completely chill hanging with Sullivan. I think he’d have much to teach me, both about the craft of writing and about life.
Racked: 04-24-2009
4:25 – Wolferton Handicap – Resurge (20/1) e/w
For the third year running, Norway has been named the best country in the world to be a mother.
For me, goals scored isn’t the only statistic that is important in this analysis as sometimes strikers can score hat-tricks when the game is already decided, which doesn’t necessarily prove that they’re the guys to turn to when you need a man to give you the lead or back into a game.
Then she hears a sound. Talk, actually. A whole discussion. In a language she doesn't understand.
If every time it rains, it rains, pennies from heaven (Shubby Dobby)
I used a Pampered Chef scrapper to apply my texture. I have read that Dap dry wall repair can be used also.
for moving.
Buckle in and be not faint of heart! Here we go…
“Why do you want me to climb the roof?” I ask to no one in particular. Death never spoke, but Death could hear.
She left to check the correct price. People behind me started doing the "checkout dance" as I call it, when they try to calculate if switching to another line would save them more time than waiting in this one. Some stayed, some took the risk and line jumped.
Is My flesh for the life of the world,
It was a 40+year old man's head. Not a 30-something woman.
That calls to me through clouded eyes.
The Metro Organization for TexasTea Acquisitions or MOTA, estimates the while Customs and Border Protection and Hudspeth County Sheriff were occupied with Nelson, an estimated $39 billion was smuggled through Hudspeth County alone.
Leftover pizza and broccoli
Following the Winsome Drop earrings pattern, I just made the top part of the pattern for the earrings as well as the pendant & tatted the chain to go with the pendant. I really liked the way it turned out at the end and was instant hit with my friends.
Hello! Thanks for having me here, Sue. I think it’s certainly true that the term ‘flash fiction’ is a new one and also that the form (as well as the short story) has seen a resurgence in popularity over the past few years (which is wonderful!) but I’m not convinced it’s all that new a form. I think very, very short stories have been around for a long, long time. Fables, folk tales and fairy tales are often brief. And we shouldn’t forget the brilliant short-short stories people like Hemingway, Lovecraft, O Henry, Chekhov, Vonnegut and Kafka produced. (Here’s one of my favourite Kafka shorts). But, history lesson aside (sorry!) I think I’m drawn to writing short-short stories because of their immediacy. Often a piece of very short fiction is no longer than the moment it’s describing and, like those moments – which are often so short – they stay with us long after. I think, also, that flash fiction gives us the opportunity of being more direct, of getting straight to the point, and then out again, quickly.
And you would face down the abominable hordes of hell alone to defend even the smallest, most insignificant corner of it.
Corbett: yes - being against child molesting
Lately I’ve been concentrating on more of my song writing. I decided to buy a new song writing book to start fresh in! I’ve always written songs or played around with chords on guitar now and again, but the thing that sparked my sudden motivation for song writing is this girl in my class. I’m not going to say too much in case for some amazingly strange reason she reads this, but let’s just say she’s not my favourite person in my class. I do have reasoning, it’s not like I’m pulling this out of thin air or anything.
The next and last of the deceiving Calvin’s chief heresies is the P in TULIP, which stands for Perseverance of the Saints. This means that once a person enters a state of sanctifying grace (our union with God while being free of sin), he will never leave it. So after achieving sanctifying grace, you will never sin again, persevering to the end to reach heaven. Of course, this incorrect teaching would only apply to the “elect”, as others couldn’t possibly reach heaven! Perseverance of the saints is most definitely wrong, for no one is perfect, and those who are perfect will make a mistake at some point, as humans are NOT GOD! For the last time in this essay, we shall prove John Calvin wrong using the Sacred Scripture: Jesus himself says that people will “believe only for a time and fall away in time of trial (Luke 8:13)”. But as stated earlier, we will get second chances, and we could use the opportunities to amend our lives and prevent ourselves from sinning. The deceitful teaching we call perseverance of the saints proclaims that one can just “sit back” after entering a state of grace, and now we know how wrong Calvin was in even daring to teach this.
But for the moment, let's ponder a different path. What might be some unforeseen consequences if the True Conservative were to come out on top with the GOP nomination, handing it to Honest Rick Santorum.
Another had style
"Looks like some sort of biohazard..." she postulates. They'd been an item once until she found out he'd been buying the affections of another and the whole relationship had ended badly. High price to pay for a comfortable fuck. His presence is as welcome as a fart in a bottle. Hers a reminder of sweeter scented times. There's still a sexual tension between them but she's focused on her discovery. She ignores his smart-ass comments, this isn't the time nor the place.
As brands started to reach out to digital only shops to do their interactive work, traditional agencies saw money that they thought was theirs going away. So many added in digital to their offerings to provide a full-service experience for their clients. In some cases, this worked. In others, brands still went to find other agency partners. Today, many brands have different agencies handling their different channels, including broadcast, print, POP, PR, promotions, digital and much more.
6. Why Does Love Got To Be So Sad
Please join us for the book launch of
When he declines, she tears her own shirt apart. That woman has issues…
little things. real things. life.
For those of you who are new to the battle, here's an introduction post I wrote in it's first year. But basically, it's a bracket-style elmination competition for books. I organize the event, but I don't have any hand in the judging or determining the winner. Judges are selected from volunteer book bloggers, YA lit enthusiasts, and blog readers. Each bracket is judged by a new set of volunteers, who choose which book will move on, and which book does not. This is the 3rd battle at The Shady Glade, and each year has had a different theme.
M – oh. Ok. Well…sorry…you’ve really caught me off guard, here. I mean, you haven’t even told me your name!
Mr Blyth has been required by Nanny's chums from Tendring District council to submit a seven-page document for permission to plant "a seasonal display of flowers" (daffodils) at his farm.
A man and a woman who had never met before, but were both married to other people, found themselves assigned to the same sleeping room on a Trans-continental train.
"It was 1960," said Jo Ann. "I was a student at the University of Texas in Austin. My friend and I were looking for things to join, as students do, and we noticed a poster inviting people to a meeting, so we went."
‘People no longer want more,’ opined one business guru in today’s Sundays, ‘they want value’. Indeed they do. And increasingly, they want Government to do something about the bad guys. How Tesco can quite openly enjoy a 31% market share and avoid being forced to sell some stores by the M&M committee is a little out of my league I’m afraid, as I was never good at the illogic of exceptions. We might look for a lead from Vince Cable, but his too is round the neck, being held by Osborne; and as we already know, following the Newscorp scandal, his underling Jeremy Rhyminge-Slang’s only lead is the one held by Dave.
My son was cracking up! I’m saying do you believe that guy? He’s mad because he’s being asked to do his job? And then he’s talking about something unrelated to his job? I’m wondering if this scam of his really works for him? I’ll give him credit. He gets up early to get his gig started. At least he’s not on a street corner.
At the top of Park Hill, I leave Park Pale as it disappears into dense woodland once more, and follow a gravelled logging track into Parkhill Inclosure. Now more accessible, this part of the New Forest is waymarked and managed for access by the Forestry Commission. I meet dog walkers, and families on mountain bikes speeding downhill along the tracks into gully bottoms. All around are enormous timber trees: gigantic Sitka spruce and Douglas fir towering overhead, one of which I calculate as being 46m tall. The usual guilty thought crosses my mind: I would love to get in there with a chainsaw and fell one of these giants; the adrenalin rush and buzz as such a tree falls – imperceptibly at first (will it sit back? should I have used a hi-lift wedge?), then gradually gathering speed (have I gone too deep with the backcut? will the hinge break too early?), accelerating earthwards to land with a crashing and splintering of side branches and a reverberating THUD – is amazing.
2. What was your favorite thing that happened in April?
it's different. On Sunday's a do a slow stirred- soft scrambled egg, with whatever is in season, ramps if it's spring (grilled in garlic butter) or in Fall, I'll serve the eggs with thick cut double smoked bacon. Weekdays are in general more frantic. I'm lucky if I get a cup of warm tea and toast and marmalade. My son has a croissant fetish, right now. Fresh Direct makes good ones that I get delivered during the week, then keep them frozen till the weekend, where I heat them up till buttery and crisp and serve them with the scrambled eggs. He loves
Moon attempted to catch his breath, his little heart was beating like a crazy drum!
I am obsessed with self-actualization. I'm always striving to know more about myself, analyze my behavior/thought patterns, and continue to develop into a mini Christ. Thus, I am obsessed with the Meyers-Briggs personality tests (Only dating site I would ever sign up for if they had one). Have you ever taken the test? If not, you can take it here. I am an INFJ. The INFJ is known as the "Protector." We have introverted intuition with extroverted feeling. INFJ's are also a rare breed, as we make up less than 1% of the population.
Soul: Memorizing and Serving
This is what I’m looking at when I’m live on TV. I can’t see anything the anchor is referencing or myself…just a camera lens and a bunch of lights.
